and, my goodness, we are enjoying every second.
What about you? like or loathe your name?
My group was broken into several teams including Media Planning, Research, and Creative. I was part of the creative team which handles all design and production of the ads and other materials that the viewer will ultimately interact with. While the other teams in the group are equally important to the success of the project as a whole, I am going to going to focus almost exclusively on the creative aspect of the campaign in this, and future posts.
However, this is could not have been done on purpose and could not have been the establishments original intent. No one when opening a restaurant, or any business in general, wants to open with rude service, crude conversation, and criticizing customers. But this quirky way of doing things ended up evolving into something good for business oddly enough and truly remarkable.
Our lives are so busy and it's just so convenient to eat out. But 99% of the time, we make terrible decisions when eating out. There's usually always at least something fried that we eat.
I hate feeling useless...and non productive.
Type trays. I did my first one in a workshop with Lynne Perrella, gesso-ing, texturing, painting and then filling the openings in the tray with a variety of found objects and ephemera. I did several for an Open Studio Tour and they were quite popular. Going through my stash to find the things to use us more than half the fun of doing them!
After yesterday’s questioning of Minister Noonan’s statements on the effects of the upcoming Fiscal Treaty and both Sinn Fein and The Socialist Party unveiling their arguments for a “NO” vote it was of course perfect timing for Vincent Browne to judge a live debate on TV3.
Ever wondered what sort of stuff I write when I'm not entertaining the world with my blogging and tweeting skills?
In other news ive also joined a local knitting and chrochet group AND the local art group. I'm utterly terrified but I need to do this for me.
Fine gifts~ from the sweetest of families!
After the woman decided that putting her child up for adoption was the right thing, she told the cameras why she went on the show. She wanted adopted children who struggle with the fact that their birth-parents didn’t want them, to understand how difficult it probably was for their mothers to give them up. She loved her newborn child more than anything in the world, but she knew deep down that she wouldn’t be able to raise the child as well as the adopted parents, and by telling her story, maybe a child who was adopted will have a better understanding of his or her life.
We are approaching the point at which the future is about to veer one way or another. Just as with 1930s Spain, one doesn’t have to be a Communist to fight on the republican side. I am not a socialist, but if enough Sovereign States say no to the bankers, the globalists, the Bilderbergers and the ISPs, then Orwell’s haunting prophecy need not be fulfilled.
I know that God’s strength is greater than my weakness, which is greatly reassuring, as my weaknesses are great and many. So, I pray for the wherewithal to allow God to take charge, and to be my strength, overcoming my weaknesses; giving me the freedom and strength to prioritise God, and the courage to put my hand up and say, “Yes! I have seen God. He is in everyone.”
They were gentle, kind, compassionate people. During their college days, in the 1940s, they became communists. Their experience of poverty lead them to believe that communism offered the world the first truly realistic shot at equality.
I left around 11:30 (we got there at 9:00 am!) to get my hair highlighted. I was about 3/4 done getting the foils put in when I get a frantic call from Mr Pug. His task for the day was to take two of our pugs, Dixie and Harley, to the vet so they'd be cleared for boarding while we were gone. (Sophie went a week or two ago.) He went to get gas and while his car was on, he somehow got locked out... with the pugs in the car! He wanted me to come let him in with his spare key (on my keyring.) I tried to explain that I had chemicals in my hair and couldn't leave til they were done. Clearly that didn't make the situation any better. We couldn't find anyone to come pick up my key and bring it to him, so I just took off right after she washed my hair (soaking wet!) to try and help him. By then though, he had a locksmith come and open the door for him. Luckily his car and the pugs are ok, and they made it to the vet. We took some much-needed together time that night.
Genre: Fiction
You write from Italy, wishing John were there
I make another stop to check my front tire. I know it's centered properly, but it feels wrong somehow - and there's a sort of smush-smush-smush as I ride which baffles me. If I didn't know better I'd think it had some sort of flat spot (which is impossible).
Celery Salt. Looks old. Can’t remember the last time I used it. Can’t find the expiration date but it does have the price on it. $1.43. That in itself is telling. Since spices can now cost more than a quick drive through the fast food line.
On top of all of this I get Aunt Flo showing up so now I bleed on both ends, damn this girl can not cut a break.
A certain Jalaleddine Farsi, who had run for president in Iran, then withdrawn his candidacy, as his great-grandfather was of Afghani origin, thus rendering him ineligible, by the terms of the Iranian constitution, and the late Muhammad Saleh Husseini, then Imam Khomeini's Mideast representative and director of Islamic liberation movements, met on August 26, 1978, with Major General Saleh Abu Shereida, chief of Libyan Intelligence and close confidant of Qaddafi at the Beirut International Hotel.
Minis:
Hello friends... I'm so excited and honoured to be part of this Blog Hop with the brand new 2012 Hero Arts Stamps and it's such fun joining up with past Hostesses for the week long Hop.
We are almost out of my very favorite time of year, and it is time to send out our Yearly Greetings to Special Family and Friends!!! I have now decided to take one stress off of myself and start sending our Annual Christmas letter as a New Year’s Letter from now on. December is just so busy with 4 little ones and I never seem to get the letter and card ready to mail out until Christmas or a few days later so instead we will do a New Year’s letter and that will be more FUN for me!!! I did not make this decision until after I had created and had our Christmas Card for the Year printed up, so it still says Merry Christmas :)
It is hard and inflexible. A normal teat is squishy so you can actually get milk out. The good news is that the milk is still OK and I can get milk out if I milk her by squeezing the lower part of the udder and the upper part of the teat. The bad news is that it is very painful for her and she will get mastitis if I can’t keep the milk flowing or unless I dry her off so that there is no milk production at all. You can’t stimulate milk production on one side and not the other.
The red panda sleeps with its tail wrapped around its body, and is identifiable by the russet fur with white patches on the snout, “eyebrows,” cheeks and lining the ears.
It doesn't to me.
Miles Morgan, managing director of Miles Morgan Travel, said: ‘This cruise has been five years in the making and every step of the way we have sought to make it authentic to the era and a sympathetic memorial to the passengers and crew who lost their lives.’
Yesterday it was my morning to visit with Jude and I spent some time playing with him, went to rounds and held him. He seemed a little fussy in the beginning but as the morning passed I grew more and more concerned about the way that Jude was acting. He was really weepy and wanted to snuggle extra. He just wasn't playing like he has been. His heart rate and rate of respiration were also higher than they've been over the last few days. And he had a slightly raised temperature.
Caroline Munro as Stella Star
even though there were many strange
Making brownies was not on my agenda today. But as I was looking through recipes, came across this one from a friend from our wedding shower over 2 1/2 years ago now. It sounded like it would be a great treat and I just needed one ingredient to make them. So, I hopped on my bike (my new favorite thing to do), rode up to the grocery store, put the marshmallow fluff in my basket and rode back home.
Now where things get a little serious…A Cautionary Tale of Colon Cancer:
I always keep foolishly giving people more and more who offer nothing in return but a distinct taste of dissatisfaction.
Once it is inhaled, solver is rapidly absorbed into the bloodstream which carries it all round the body. This is much faster than the digestive system which would have required that the silver solution first be digested by the body.
I need no stroller
THEN turn then oven on to 350 and roast
Gets Stevie a glass eye and a bit of brain damage.
More often though, I am brought down to unwanted depths…
If Democrats are going to try to get brownie points for insisting that the rich pay more in taxes, they are apparently demanding that the government force everyone to pay more, but are not going to put their money where their respective mouths are.
Opposition is not idle this time around either, read this Prachatai article (is sort of review of Red-shirts’ blog called “Thai E-News” ) :
Vanessa- It's Jesus's rain.
“Be rational, Le Clown. Channel your inner Spock.” Readers, meet my inner voice. We don’t get along. But I’ll play along, for once. Objectively, we know that as parents, my wife and I are not irresponsible for choosing to avoid the methylphenidate path for my son’s attention disorder (ADD). We’ve researched both the ADD diagnosis and methylphenidate, and we’ve opted for concentration exercises, instead of jumping on the so very popular drug wagon. Somehow, we think we’re doing my son a favour. End of rational paragraph.
Ironically, despite the failed privatisation, our railways are currently booming, as a partial result of high fuel costs, which have driven car users back onto the rails. At the moment taxpayers (but not necessarily some Conservative party donors) pay around 40% of the rail costs. In January 2012, we saw the usual annual rail ticket price rises, when the average cost of regulated fares, such as season tickets, rose by some 6%.
ROM 1:4 And declared to be the Son of God with power, according to the spirit of holiness, by the resurrection from the dead:
By the way, there are lots of other good articles over on that blog about outdoor adventuring. Take a look if you have time.
This week Dee Jackson is our challenge host!!! Dee is challenging us to cut it out and pop it up!!! We are cutting out items and popping them up to add dimension and interest to our cards!!! The sky is the limit with this one. Just remember to cut it out and pop it up!!! We would love to see what you create!!!
Which is the largest gig you did with them?
My biggest difficulty was breadth vs. depth. I went for big picture over specifics, but there’s a lot more that could be done in a more concentrated version of the same archive.
As you can guess, I ended up on the night train, a train I used to use a lot after gigs in Edinburgh. This slow paced bastard calls at Haymarket, South Gyle, Dalmeny, North Queensferry, Inverkeithing, Dalgety Bay, Aberdour, Burntisland, Kinghorn, Kirkcaldy, Markinch, Ladybank, Springfield, Cupar, Leuchars and Dundee and trust me, by Kirkcaldy you are suicidal. Springfield tips you over the edge. The station lights turned off as we pulled in - they obviously didn't expect anyone to be using the station and they were right.
3) Tris from Divergent by Roth
(By the way the North Caroline Court has stated that just because you failed to object doesn’t mean that the party trying to foreclose doesn’t need to prove its case, which is why I think the last couple of days have been the turning point where borrowers get their day in court and pretender lenders get their days or years in jail).
Now I just need a name for the church. I'm thinking about "Sundance Temple of Free Unschoolers." You supply the acronym. ;-)
My Nephew and Niece are coming over for vacation and it's going to be one hectic time. I know I will have to prepare myself to make all their favorite dishes. They both love my food and naturally I don't need any other incentive to keep cooking. Only I should plan if I can create a thali out of it..:)
Casting the leads was the real surprise for moviegoers who saw the film in 1944. Deanna Durbin was the reigning sweetheart at Universal since she signed on almost a decade before. Unknown Durbin had made a short film called “Every Sunday” in 1936 at MGM with then also unknown 14 year-old Judy Garland. It was a screen test of sorts for the two young hopefuls. Metro kept Judy and Deanna signed with Universal. It is said that the lively Durbin’s popularity saved the struggling studio from bankruptcy. Her films were light as a feather and always featured her lilting operatic voice. Christmas Holiday was chosen as her first dramatic role and it was reportedly her favorite.
If you're about to start a new season garden, your time will be best served by enriching your soil. This will do more for the health of your garden and the abundance of your crops than any fertiliser you apply later in the season. If you plant your seeds and seedlings into fertile, living soil, you give them the best chance of success.
Families of Russian servicemen from the Russian base at Gyumri in Armenia close to the borders of Georgia and Turkey already have been evacuated, Russian sources say.
tough ex-marine with wet,
Hugging
Packs/cards: 6 packs / 8 cards
Now usually each week when I am looking for a hot man to find naked pictures of so that we can shallowly grade him just on his looks (Oh don't get defensive, you know we do) I try to find a male celeb that has been in the news that week, (I like to keep it current innit?)
MW: We have asked the ethics committee the same question. Why has it taken so long to bring the charges? The OCE report was made public just as the House was going into a six week summer break. That hurt, because there’s no real opportunity to contest the charges and that’s not fair. So that’s why we have publicly demanded that the committee release the full report that contains the specific charges.
Cornbread is unlike the cakey version of its Southern cousin, arriving as egg-sized individual balls that have been deep-fried. The exterior shell is harder to crack apart that we first expect, revealing a dense cumin-studded bread that we spread generously with the house-made cumin butter supplied.
Winnie the Pooh comes out this weekend. Surely, Rabbit doesn’t own an oozie for ridding Pooh out of his rabbit hole?
Spread the mascarpone-amaretto frosting on top.
7. A Tiger Beat article about Justin Bieber’s favorite candy
Venue: Westin Hotel. 10135 – 100 Street
Sunscreen burn blinds eyes.
It will be interesting to observe the EU’s devious and brainwashing tactics to ensure the Irish vote in favour. Sadly, the only outcome in the long run is that no Irish Eyes will be smiling and the luck of the Irish will have vanished. All I can advise the people of Ireland to do is vote ‘No’ and keep kissing the Blarney Stone – it’s their only hope.
To my good fortune, I signed a contract with an independent publisher last year and the novel will be released in a small run some time in the 3rd quarter of this year.
15 office
There's a lot to digest there. And that's only half of the report. Lots and lots of serious infection problems. The wooden fermenters, in particular, sound certain to have been harbouring all sorts of nasties.
Subway 6" Turkey Breast Sandwich (add all the veggies you want
And Happy Lunar New Year to everyone!! Any Dragons out there? :)
Around the corner from us, one family tore open the front room and turned it into a kitchen-take-out area, with one table for dining. That business only lasted about a month - long enough for me to try their inexpensive chicken dinner prepared Cuban-style, and then they shut down.
get rid of
They will say hello, how are you and wait for you to answer them and then tell them where to take you.
I wasn’t surprised as I walked away. I had become so tolerant it seems, desensitised by what used to make my heart bleed.
If you've read a newspaper or a news website over the last couple of days, you've probably seen the stories about our good friends at Fentimans having their delicious lemonade branded an 'imitation liquor' by officials in the town of Houlton, Maine, in the good ole US of A. At the centre of the furore is the up to 0.5 per cent alcohol by volume that is created when Fentimans botanically brew their drinks.
-I have to put the toilet seat down if it’s up for Reed because it’s too loud if he slams it down (makes his ears bleed) and he’s afraid it will pinch him if he lowers it.
Today is the first day of spring and also first day of LazyPalooza 2008. For Easter pretty much all of Norway is closed from today (Thursday) straight through til Monday. Back to work Tuesday. This gives me FIVE FULL DAYS of not having to do anything. Not having to go anywhere. Not having to count time. Not having to do anything that involves anything business or money transaction or anything because EVERYTHING is closed. Sort of enforced nothingness, which really removes any latent guilt one might have about being a lazy good for nothing roustabout.
What's your cooking blunder of the week?
Choosing a good company is great because they aren't just a local company that provides corporate event entertainment to one city. They have entertainers all over the country so that it is possible for them to send someone to cities all across the United States. What's more, they have entertainers who will travel as well, and if that is in your budget, you can get a comedian or an entertainer in your city, even if they live somewhere else.
I hope you find it useful or at least funny!
Check Google Docs for those. If you were out, or if you lose things quickly, you can get everything but Didion’s essay through Google, too. Read it all carefully. Then check the Student Portal. There won’t be anything there yet, so come back periodically over the next two days. It will get crowded very soon. When it does, we’ll talk triage.
We actually lobbed an offer in last week on a cute house with lots of potential. We had to decide by today if we were going to step up and play "highest and best".
3) For the record, " 'roid rage" is real. I think I already blogged about how my kids got super-intense and cranky when they were on steroids for their croup. Now I understand why they cried for three straight days! I can't stop sweating. My heart is pounding -- not racing, just beating loudly enough I can hear it. The good news is the drugs give me a ton of energy and I have cleaned the whole house twice since Monday. The bad news is when people decide to mess up my cleaning, I have to physically remove myself from the room so I don't hurt someone.
I thought Natalie Portman looked gorgeous. This is my style of dress/jewels etc. It's probably not 'Oscar-y' enough but it's quite old-school. You can picture the 1950's starlets in something like this can't you.
Pale ale
And also, CONGRATS to Daniel... now to figure out how to get *my* hands on this book.... since it doesn't actually come out until October 9...
Of course, it’s not all about sex. It’s about other things too. But it’s related. We wouldn’t be here without it.
We did manage to find a good man, who just so happened to work at the chocolate store to help us out with the tire, but that was after taking a taxi all the way to Walmart to buy a lug wrench (I didn't have one in my car). Of course there was nothing much to do since the tire was irreparable and it was around 1 a.m. so I couldn't just buy another tire.
This is a TWO-DAY hop, so be sure to check out both days so you don't miss any creativeness. Because there is a large number of participants I will give you until January 30th to post your comments for the two days of the blog hop. Thanks for joining us!
It is absolute nonsense that our war was against blacks.
magnifying glass
I recognize that this statement is pragmatic more than it is philosophical, at least in the way I would have imagined writing such a statement as a graduate student or at the beginning of my career. I wonder, in looking over it, to what extent I’m actually falling prey to the functionalism I detest. What I want to communicate is that I see the traditional sense of historical-critical thinking and writing that has formed the core of history education at the collegiate level as still salient. I don’t like notions of “relevance” — ie, that students will only learn or care about things that their 18 or 20 year-old brains perceive of as relevant to their lives. But, what I want is to port those traditional skills, if you will accept the metaphor, to a context that is relevant, ie to the context of the post-industrial world.
Stir-fried squid with garlic, chilies, ginger, and greens. I've explained to people over and over that Taiwan's style is lighter and cleaner than other Chinese cuisines. No heavy complicated sauces coating fried food. Perhaps that's the American version of Chinese they are thinking of. In Taiwan it's just really great ingredients. Squid in Taiwan is superb. I am spoiled by the seafood in Taiwan.
Question for Molly? Are you going to go ahead and interview your son as was suggested? Please reply with what you intend to do or like to change??
So, I’m resisting the urge to buy a box and start handing them out.
Really good.
You can see it in the figure above, one of a group of four female figures I saw in the King Tut exhibition in Toronto many, many years ago. They are guardian figures (of Tut’s sarcophagus?), believed to be modeled after his mother. They protect the remains of her beloved son, with serenity, with peace, with gentleness and love.
“I’m Palestinian”, I say, looking them straight in the eye, watching first for the flicker of recognition, then for the fizzle of expectation and hope as the imagination that lives behind their eyes quickly kills off or severely maims images of a could-have-been friendship. Because now it’s just all too complicated. Now it’s about more than just the two of us.
About a month ago, I bought two healthy looking chokos at the market in the hope they would sprout. Sure enough, they have, and soon they'll be planted out in the vegetable garden at the base of the fence near the chook shed. Slowly buy surely, they'll creep up the fence, up the side of the shed and cover it by January. In Australia, chook sheds and choko vines go hand in hand. It's a good cheap way to provide shade in summer, you pull it out in winter and let the sun hit the shed, then replant again in spring.
The student told the Norwegian news outfit that he started writing letters to Breivik in February. Forts said he wanted to show support for Breivik’s ideology and tell the prisoner he believed he was “not the terrorist neo-Nazi that the media portrays him to be.”
This set of 6 CDs contains almost 8 hours of music, personal interviews taken from the Saturday Evening Post archives, and other memorabilia such as presidential speeches and history of Christmas songs and traditions. It is narrated by Alex Burton.
I hope you all enjoyed the Fall Festival and the parade. Wish I could have been there this weekend for that. I pray that this Sunday finds you well.
We could make it our own.
I hope to be great someday.
Left to Right... Scrapbooking Betty, Nurse Betty, UK Betty, Hogwarts Betty, Liberty Betty, Bikini Betty, Morning Betty, and Just Betty
‘Hi’ I mumble back feebly,
Nail appointments.
15 but enjoyed his first winner for permit holder Marcus Callaghan (who was also celebrating his maiden victory) when Shrug landed a handicap hurdle at
TURKEY BURGERS
Mayo! Since this is made with TONS of eggs it's a no-no. I miss sandwiches, tuna, and chicken salad. Lunch is so boring now. Sigh.
Plus, it has the added advantage of a OTP that actually make me want to root for them to be together even in real life! (I adore Han Ji Min and I adore JYJ, so Han Ji Min x Park Yoochun is a pairing that totally makes me nod my head fervently ^^)
handmade hair flowers (so cute) & a hot glue gun.
Papers:
Here's the DIY instructions if you'd like to make one too:
Rhododendron ‘Nancy Evans’ (‘Hotei’ x ‘Lem’s Cameo’) – This is the ‘big wow’ of yellow rhododendrons with amazing golden-yellow (salmon highlights when emerging) blooms emerging from reddish-orange buds from April to May. This RHS Award of Garden Merit winner has oval-shaped deep green foliage. ‘Nancy Evans’ grows 3-4′ high. Hardy to zone 6.
Sourced from a portion of a sermon delivered by Rev. Adrian Dieleman on September 6, 2009. The link to the full sermon is here.
Nice light, malty smell with a floral, almost soapy smell at first. Lavender, maybe? Slightly pils-ish when cold, but when it warms it gets a hint of that Belgian/German wit smell that I don't like.
Because I can’t tell you EVERYTHING that goes on in our home.
Notice the river picture above… And notice the rock in the middle… A twin-rock embrace, making a bridge of sorts.. At first I thought this was the Bheem Pul…
Things to consider that the DON’T tell you:
Solution to my slow pace: I going to simply my race training for the next 2 weeks. I’m going to do this by running 2-3 miles every other day. This should accomplish 2 things: 1) fully restore my mental toughness and 2) get my pace down to 7:30; once those 2 things happen, nothing will be able to stop me!!! From there I’ll be able to go along w/ my original training plan.
Packing for this trip is a greater stress to my life than watching my precious Razorbacks play against LSU. Or that dumb crimson tide.
Chris: Whatever.
I based this little box on a fabulous tutorial from Bronwyn which you can find HERE. Mine ended up being a whole box, rather than a treat holder because the WWs are quite large. I made the box with a flap opening in the top for easy access. The cute images are from Dustin Pike. The monkey's sign comes blank so I added the text and arrow with My Memories Suite...the more I use it, the more I love this software. The monkey inside has a half-eaten cupcake in the original image, which I removed for this project, and looks like he's over-indulged :) The images were coloured with Copics...not even any glitter pens on this one :( Wonder why boys don't have the same fascination with bling that us girls do lol
So a good week to contemplate which of these categories we each fit in, for we are all surely called to be shepherds in our own proper way, whether of ourselves alone, of our families, those we work with, or those we influence through our words and actions.
- The name knickers came from the long bloomers that used to be women and girls underwear.
*She sees someone following her in their car.
Congrats to our three winners! Here are some guidelines to redeem your prizes, please get in touch with the vendors providing items in your pack shortly, let's say 48h :) By email or by posting on their FB page.
Bake uncovered in a moderate oven for about 10-15mins until cheese is melted and topping is golden brown. Mmmm...this is sooooo delicious! I great meal to have when people come for tea. The lemon juice just makes it! Serve with rice and steamed green beans.
It's been known for some time that socioeconomic status in humans effects health (see here), but the causes of this have been in dispute. For instance, Linda Gottfredson has written numerous papers on the relation between IQ and health outcomes. (See Intelligence Predicts Health and Longevity, but Why?, pdf). SES and IQ have, of course, a very strong positive correlation, but, according to Gottfredson (and Deary), "These relations remain significant after controlling for socioeconomic variables."
If you, like me, worry about the superior speaking ability of Obama in this upcoming election–his superb way of holding his head high, and how he always sounds like he knows what he is talking about–let us compare him to this fine chap, Daniel Hannan, conservative from South England. Someone who REALLY knows how to use the English language.
I can't show you anything on the "other" (main) version of this quilt, but "my" version... here you go. I have to say, it really sucks looking at super-up-close pictures of your own quilting in contrasting threads! All of these pictures are of the back of the quilt, and super cropped so that you can't see the actual design of the quilt. Wait a couple of weeks and you'll see it all.
Cheever rejects this analysis and the psychiatric consultations are discontinued.
I remember the train used to barrel out of the 4th Avenue tunnel at speeds well over 55 mph. The F would pass the platform in less than 5 seconds. The local would look like a blur as we rocketed by it. Before you knew it you were passing Smith 9th street and going down the big curve. This is when I would be lucky enough to see the progress on the World Trade Center. Just a skeleton of a building getting higher every week. It was really history seeing that building go up on the way to High School every day. So sad what happened.
hugs Janie xx
Devyn did a whole lot of this today:
(c) Aurore Ciholas
The cups the smoothies were served in were quite large- I actually only had half of mine and saved the rest for later. I will say that I was disappointed to see that they were made out of styrofoam- bad for the environment and harmful to ingest! One other thing I noticed was that a lot of the smoothies involved a lot of juice and sherbet or frozen yogurt- all very high in sugar. A better option would be soy milk, rice milk, or even coconut water. Add some Stevia for sweetness.
20. How many times do you text "LOL" without really laughing out loud? Doesn't this make you feel the least bit guilty? I've never seen anyone actually drop and roll on the floor with laughter while texting either, what are we teaching our children? And don't tell me,,,, you do still have your ass don't you??!! Liar.
She slowly calms down and they eat. Another quiet evening passes.
5. Breakfast for dinner: yay or nay?
At this stage though my conclusion is that this album shows glimpses of what the Wombats are capable of four years later in This Modern Glitch, but in 2007 they were still finding their way. Maybe I’ll soften up on this view as the songs become more familiar with time…
But I didn't know how to frame it. Then, flipping through March's Elle Decor, there it was.
to home.
Third, it's a 3 color patch that I'm guessing is either from the name plate or a number.
Stickers on the contrary are motivated by affection, by such love for a place and its life that they want to preserve it and remain in it. Of my grandfather I need to say only that he shared in the virtues and the faults of his kind and time, one of his virtues being that he was a sticker. He belonged to a family who had come to Kentucky from Virginia, and who intended to go no farther. He was the third in his paternal line to live in the neighborhood of our little town of Port Royal, and he was the second to own the farm where he was born in 1864 and where he died in 1946.
An effective response might be, “Even though Roger is not my favorite person, I don’t think it is funny to embarrass people. Besides, it is illegal.”
2. Shady Lane
I crashed into the side of the house.
That was my feeling when I introduced Michael Delacour to the Unitarian Universalist Social Justice committee luncheon held at the Common Table restaurant here in Bend, Oregon. Michael is one of the few people to ever challenge Ronald Reagan and win his personal political goals. Therefore he is a good person to present to the people who are seeking to make a meaningful change in our local and national political scene.
The band in prime form
The problem with the concept of free tuition = universal accessibility is that there is not an unlimited number of taxpayer dollars to finance such a lofty goal. The government would then need to restrict accessibility in order to get sufficient value for the taxpayer’s dollar.
In thinking about this, I realized that Lonergan’s language about God as an unrestricted act of understanding corresponds to his language about the human desire for unrestricted understanding. This made me think that one could plausibly run an inductive argument for realism to support his second premise. The argument from desire will, here, act as the model inductive argument (since I suspect that the argument I am here providing is simply the semantic equivalent to the argument from Desire that C.S. Lewis is responsible for, except that it is steeped in Lonergan’s vocabulary).
Check it.
In English, we turn and we go. We turn left. We turn right. But if we continue in the same direction, we go straight. But to get lost we take (or make) a “wrong” turn.
And there are so many more communities that lost so much.
However, some Yahoo readers questioned if Belmont is being too presumptuous to assume that no laws were broken:
Well, of course, Rand has no such evidence. There is absolutely no evidence that rock music, in and of itself, induces lethargy. Quite the contrary, it seems rather a kind of stimulant. And while rock music is not known for being particularly sophisticated, especially when compared to classical music, there is no compelling evidence that it paralyzes cognition or induces a state of "sensory deprivation."
Wasn’t Henry Porter
But what caught me was the notion of how we create worlds through our words. I used to write a lot. However, a malady has struck me in the recent years of my life that has rendered me unable to write.
But seriously, this shit gets hilarious.
3. Ever had a cream puff?
Notes: To understand how bankers have been robbing us and getting us killed in their wars please consider this:
instead prefers to slide and slump
(now Ace responds) The left, to a man, considers itself to be educated and enlightened. It matters not how little actual schooling a particular leftist may have had, nor how unintelligent the person might be. They all consider themselves intellectuals of sorts. If they dropped out of college after one semester, they just think of themselves as autodidacts whose genius could not be stimulated by the ossified and bourgeois teaching of the academy. If they’re just plain stupid or crazy -- like, say, Charlie Sheen -- they indulge in farcical conspiracy-theorizing, reassuring themselves that they are intellectual because they know things others do not. They are one of the chosen few brave enough to see past the web of lies and glimpse the arcane truth behind, say, the implosion of the World Trade Center (a SEAL team planted those charges, you know?).
Like I said earlier, I have argued with myself whether or not to share this rather personal experience. It feels weird to type it up like it's just some normal day in the life of Amelia, instead of the weird, surreal and saddening experience that it really was and continues to be. But there are some reasons for sharing that outweigh the weirdness:
Why they indulge in games of chance
You Can Change Your Own Fate: Even if you're a side character or a villain, Dream High says that you can develop into the hero or heroine of your own story. I love Teacher Oh-hyuk for telling Hyemi this because it's an in-story example of what makes the show so captivating; Hyemi starts out as a classic villainess, then grows and changes until she's a heroine. Baekhee starts out as a Cinderella, then grows into a wicked stepsister. But maybe, with time, she could change her role once more?
Let's see how close on the Wordnet.
For hundreds of years he’s avoided brood society, until a werewolf kills an innocent human woman and Brand finds himself dragged back into the violent politics of the shapeshifters. When the two brood women who mean the most to him come under threat, he must take up the throne and risk becoming the kind of vicious bastard his father was, or let the broods descend further into chaos–taking the friend he swore to protect and his lover with them.
The Turnip-Shaped Cloud
was already at 20 degrees Celsius and that’s how it continued for the
Thursday, I chaired a very useful meeting of the Department for Education's Gypsy, Roma and Traveller Stakeholder Group. We had the best attendance ever, and got through a substantial agenda in two and a quartr hours.
I went to see my mate, who had horses everywhere-----he always broke his horses to saddle before breaking them to harness---I asked if he had anything, maybe retired or out spelling that he would let Jenny have for a while.
Carinin looked up. “Who led you to this discovery?”
Happy Friday, friends!
regarding funds earmarked to buy
Best Animated Film: Rango.
Development Support Communication has changed as the world has changed. From the patronising tradition of the modernisation paradigm, more emphasis is seemingly now on dialogue and empowerment, involving beneficiaries in the communication process and giving them power to shape policies (Quebral 1972). DSC itself came about as a solution to the limitations of Development Communication (DC) where communication barriers emanating from cultural, wealth and power differences between the development agents (benefactor) and the targeted communities (beneficiaries) were not fully questioned. A redirection of development initiatives towards participation of the intended beneficiaries in planning and implementation of development programmes resulted (Agunga 2006).
God wants to give you the strength to rise above them and refuse to allow your circumstances and environment to determine the level of the life you live. He wants to be your strength and source. He wants to give you the ability to be stable and steadfast in good times and in bad!
The subconscious speaks to us with images, pictures and feelings. Many times when I’m asleep, all I see are just pictures which flip through or float by and of course any emotions which are attached to these images. I call this, my brain cleaning out closets and getting rid of things I no longer need. (Although, nothing is ever really gone, just stored deeper). Then there are the times when I see a truly ridiculous performance played out which really makes no sense but has intense emotions attached. Upon waking I realize there were emotions I wasn’t facing or dealing with properly. This is my brains way of giving me the opportunity to deal with the emotions and dis-empower them so they no longer affect my waking decisions.
My students love the idea of taking their name, and using symbols, different kinds of lines, and colors to emphasize importance.
Who booked the date and when (if different from above)
Like a little too adamant. I've very rarely seen him get fired up about anything. And suddenly he's ready to take me out if I say anything bad about his beloved not real girlfriend.
... seems to me a much better alternative. It comes up all over my garden, particularly in the paths, which is encouraging with regard to whether it'll tolerate being walked on. It forms a dense mat of very short green leaves/spines and I think it has small white flowers, too. I asked my neighbour if she knew what it was and she didn't but guessed at some kind of moss. A google image search for moss brought up a plant that looks a lot like this, but isn't actually a moss. It's called Irish moss which, curiously enough, is the same name as a type of seaweed I was reading about recently.
Still inflamed and now utterly incensed, I started writing in my jagged and erratic script of how I created your wraith the second the closest notebook(its matte-finish covers gray) I grabbed fell open on my lap. My sentences run on each other, and my modifiers dangle, and my tenses disagree, displaying my incompetence - my incoherence - for anyone to see.
He Is Coming
-My little ritual this week of taking a mug of coffee, along with cinnamon raisin toast, to work and having a little breakfast picnic at my desk. I could, of course, just eat it at home, but it's somehow more fun this way.
out of the bag. Keep moving. I know
It has been an emotional period lately, re-evaluating who I am, but I have finally come to accept that I am turning some corners.
~Add a ribbon, a belt or other decorative element; why not draw attention where you want it?
When first launched, the toy didn’t even come with a body – you have to attach the parts to a real potato !! The plastic body was only introduced in 1964 – after U.S. Government rules on toys outlawed the sharp spiky prongs needed to press the face parts into a real vegetable.
Accept that they may or may not like foods based on flavor, texture or how they feel that day.
What Wendig said is correct--it's a crap shoot either way. Some stories will rise to the top, others won't. Ever read a reeeeeeeally crap bestseller? Yeah, me too. Lots of them. There are certainly lesser known books that were much better in my opinion. There is no rhyme or reason to how these things work.
I have also interviewed search committees as well. (The interview with my current congregation’s search committee lasted three hours at the local Pizza Hut!) However, the experience of being visited by a search committee (incognito) has not (as far as I know) been done to me. I have made judgments (yes judgments) about those sitting around a table in a room or restaurant as to their motivations and expectations.
Edged distress using Distress Inks
However, although they may not have noticed yet, their fantasy worlds have begun to crumble , they still pump out the lies, but more and more people are prepared to shout “Liar”, and sometimes, like now, some of us will accuse them of acts far worse than mere lies.
CEO, CTO & Co-founder, Terrafugia
And I've loved it. Koko captured my heart from the moment she entered our house, a round-bellied, wrinkle-faced pug puppy who charmed us by wearing an old sock with holes cut out for her head and legs, wrestling Big Kitty, the huge stuffed animal sent home with her, and chewing everyone's shoelaces to shreds.
Thankfully that naff experience hasn’t turned me off reading poetry or even occasionally, writing it. Last autumn, I sat through a truly delicious course at the Irish Writers’ Centre – taught by Peter Sirr – who recently won the 2011 Michael Hartnett Poetry Award. The course was a wonderful grounder and all-rounder. Peter showed us where and how to source poetic material, blurring boundaries between poetry and prose, the beauty and diabolism of staying with a poem until done. Brief interesting snippets too of poet lives and the conscionable lonely journeys to publication. I was introduced to poets I’d never heard of: Penelope Shuttle, C.P. Cavafy, Jane Hirshfield, Les Murray. “Terrible things happen and people reach for poetry to deal with it,” he told us. Poetry can make sense of horrible events but can also illuminate life’s brief thrills. You can goo the weekly schedule, complete with resources and tips, here. Meanwhile, I thought it’d be a good idea to post a poem on the blog every Saturday. I like this poem by Fay Hart for its elegant no-bullshit simplicity!
Supplies needed: A mason jar-I love the look of the old ones and found a couple at a garage sale), A pump top-you can pick these up at a craft store for around a dollar or go green and recycle one from a shampoo bottle like I did, a rubber washer, hot glue gun, Fiskars craft drill and a drill bit to match the size of the tubing of your pump, scissors and a pair of pliers.
I saw Roger Waters perform The Dark Side of the Moon live in Hyde Park in 2006 I think it was, and if you’ve seen him live yourself, you’ll know it was nothing short of totally amazing. I think the bit I loved the most was the last two tracks, Brain Damage and Eclipse. There were a quite a few people on stage – all masters of their craft – and including three female backing singers, who by the way each took a part in The Great Gig In The Sky (and smashed it), and when it came to Brain Damage and Roger sings the line “And when the band you’re in starts playing a different tune”, I know that everyone’s going to join in an and make the next line epic, and then they do, all the musicians, the three ladies and Roger, “I’ll see you on the dark side of the moon” Ahh it’s just perfect. Again my hairs stand on end, and I could die happy right then and there.
The Olweus Bullying Prevention Program is a comprehensive, school-wide program designed for use in elementary, middle or junior high schools. The program has been found to reduce bullying among children, improve the social climate of classrooms and reduce related antisocial behaviors, such as vandalism and truancy. The Olweus Program has been employed in more than a dozen countries around the world.
Bruery Saison De Lente
I've only just heard the news about David's death. He was a vital spirit, full of impish wit, and made me laugh so much during our correspondence and telephone conversations for Nightmare USA. I feel very sad that he's passed away, but the sadness is tempered with the knowledge that here was a man who really grabbed life with both hands and lived the hell out of it!
Position: Power Forward
You might be wondering why four? Well... that's what "The Bacon Bits" are challenging us with - using four of something on our cards. It could be embellishments, papers, images, etc., as long as there are four.
I love your point! Minus spelling and grammar, it's very well thought! This is why I don't put my kids in school. Kids are the ultimate minorities! They only have the rights that parents extend to them, yet, here they are, when they reach teen years, capable of reproducing... HOW DOES THAT WORK?!!!! They don't get any say whatsoever, but yet could pop out a baby today if they chose to.
The only other interesting thing was Spanish class today. My teacher was talking about the verb “coger” (ko-hair, not kogurr) which means “to grab” or “to catch” or pretty much anything that involves the action of taking, or something innocent like that, but thanks to Ms. Diecidue in Spanish III, I also happened to know that it doubles for meaning the verb of the F-word. Apparently that is a cultural thing in Spain, but not in South America. So today Dr. Chamorro told my class full of unsuspecting students – “It means ‘to fahk’.” (He is Argentinan.) So then we all laughed because I’ve only heard one other teacher say the F-word before but she didn’t say it like an Argentinan because she’s American. But then he said, “This is only in Spain! Imagine if people from Australia came to America and they were using fahk for every word because it doesn’t mean the same to them? ‘I will fahk the pencil. Fahk the trashcan. I want you to fahk my backpack.’ That’s what it’s like when people from South America go to Spain.” Totes awks.
The church needs more believers who have this same attitude: “I am thankful for what my pastors and teachers have helped me understand…but I’m a big girl now, and I can feed on this Word for myself, too.”
“I would not take it. Don’t worry. Its hard sometimes when all your children have died. When every day you have to look after 17 babies. I feel like theres no point sometimes.
on a thin
With such large amounts of hops and alcohol, what did it taste like?
When we last left our big, lumbering cube of likability, BGR (Big Giant Robot) was headed off to the city for a little unfettered sight-seeing.
Though she fears goblins, fairies, wolves and barrow ghosts, in addition to getting lost, Catla unknowingly distracts herself by raging against the vicious Nord-devils and by pitying herself for being the one left to help the village. Luckily, after resting at the standing stones overnight, she chances upon Sven, a young man from Covehithe, returning from York. Companionably Sven and Catla make their way to Aigber, but not before encountering a group of Norsemen themselves heading to Aigber but by water.
That is why the bouquet toss was born! Nowadays there may be a mad rush to catch the bride's flowers, but at least her dress is out of harm's way! (source of bouquet history-isms)
But of course this is an excellent title in terms of marketing: "in this digital age," as one blurb put it, we need such a guide. No, we don't. What many people would like is a book with this title that gives them permission to steal, appropriate, borrow, plagiarize, copy--whatever you want to call it--anything they want to. See something, like it, take it, call it your own. Pinterest, Facebook, classes, patterns, tutorials--anything you want, take it. Take it like an artist would, and you'll be creative. By golly, you'll be an artist, too! That's what they'd like, but that's not what they need.
I haven't stuck with the Jubilee design or colours because i wanted to do something a little different so i have gone with lime greens & purples, i haven't put a sentiment on it yet and that's because i forgot to put one on before i took the photo, silly me!
Owning a home taking it out of your mortgage payment can cause you to get behind on your house payments. I know it’s easier said than done, but you must allocate a certain amount of your income for home repairs and maintenance. This is not for upgrades this is just to keep your house healthy.
The alarm bells start ringing as I see the shape, figure and face of Lynne Shelloi. It's like the Enterprise going on to red alert.
Before passing any legislation, the government intends to consult with industry, and final legislative proposals are unlikely to emerge until the 2011 Finance Bill. The program is scheduled to be put in effect after April 2013.
Come on out lady...but only if your ready. :)
Well after being a little delayed in getting some product, I finally got the October kits put together to reveal. I do think they were worth the wait, although they will ship on time, so no wait for kit club members to get them.
To get the most benefit from practice, keep these two principles in mind: repetition and reflection. Repetition—lots of it—is required to make skills automatic, so that when you sit down to write your novel, they are ready to work for you. Reflection—what did I learn today? what do I need to learn next?—keeps you on track in your pursuit of excellence.
An hour or so later - "Dang, this fog is thick."
chin to chest, staring at the white
Les Brake's Coyote Garden
venetian blinds fluttering in the wind...
Leaving the party on Sunday night, Andrew stopped to ask me if I wanted the shopping bag he'd brought his beers in. I was confused by the question (why the fuck would I want to chase down the bag?) and he was confused by my confusion. He's not sure of the (notional) etiquette I apply to the running of our little household. For all he knew, it might have been my absolute favourite of all our Tesco bags. He didn't want to upset me by leaving it behind."Is this what marriage is?" asked our hostess, laughing at us. "No," I said "marriage is when he stopped at the side of the road as we were walking over here to pull out all of my grey hairs." "Yeah" my sister piped up "he was grooming her like a monkey".
3. Another luminaire from David Sutherland.
Several evidence-based approaches to improving obstetrical outcomes have been successfully implemented by other maternity care stakeholders. For additional resources and opportunities to improve maternity care visit Childbirth Connections' newest website, Transforming Maternity Care.
I will continue my efforts in “Life at Abhi” and will try to include my experiences, time to time so that younger generation takes it as a moral and never repeats the mistakes.
And it's been eventful.
02. Milleniums Ahead feat. Saheed (prod. by 7th Galaxy)
OMG I’m so close to updating the Character’s section, I can’t contain my excitement! :’DD
When my ex and I got married and had decided to go to Mexico, I wanted to make sure that we had the opportunity to see and do something we not be able to see or do anywhere else. Turns out that the awesome Mayan ruins of Chichen Itza are not far from Cancun, and our day trip there is forever burned into my memory, and the best part of that trip was being able to climb those steep steps all the way to the top of the pyramid there. Looking around at the ruins from the top of it was a memory for the ages.
There are times throughout the year when I am given an opportunity to choose to follow Jesus all over again. When I participate in Communion I recommit my life to discipleship. When I covenant with another person or group of persons to be prayerful, and when I celebrate the religious holidays, especially Easter, I am choosing to follow Jesus.
Back when he was in a private high school, here's what happened:
Zinn may sound polemical to you, but his one book has raised awareness of the shortcomings of centuries of highly selective historical vision. Maybe he just had to talk a little tough to throw off that yoke.
In my opinion, if something is so great and it never ends, then you never really appreciate the whole journey.
For a while ago, KSS released the anniversary set with Hummingbird. In spite of 8th different images to create the bird, this version is much easier to stamp and line up. I know you will enjoy stamping this wonderful creature!
Aside from the two problematic reels mentioned above, the digitally remastered image looks very pleasing, considering that the original is fifty years old. Contrast is good, and there are few blemishes, though some scenes appear somewhat bright and shimmering could be detected from time to time in background details, such as the stucco walls of the house. Unlike the stylized font used in the prints that circulated on the festival circuit and which appear in the video streaming over at The Auteurs, the subs on the DVD are standard typeface. The casual banter between Kim Young-jin and Bong Joon-ho on the commentary track and Lee Yeon-ho’s essay in the booklet add little to our appreciation of the film. The stills gallery however is beautifully presented and is well worth a look. It is to be hoped that Criterion will deem The Housemaid worthy of the treatment given to Bergman’s The Seventh Seal. In the meantime, the Korean release is acceptable and very reasonably priced.
One 12-ounce package semisweet chocolate chips (Ghiradelli works particularly well.)
Brigids Abbey: Raw Cow’s Milk, Cato Corner Farm (Colchester, CT)
A couple weeks back we were invited by one of our amazing clients, Triple Aught Design, to participate in a truly once in a lifetime experience. It all started with an obscure email requesting our full name, social security number, and birthdate. Hmm, that’s an odd request…
"Be Unique, Be Unforgettable, Be You"
or context.
Oh, please go easy with me
Wrap each beet loosely in aluminum foil and place in the oven. You can rub the beets prior to placing in the oven with olive oil or simply wrap dry, in foil. Roast until tender and easily pierced with the tip of a paring knife, about 1 hour.
Organ Meats
Back to Back have never had any truck with "special" treatment: their work has a harsh honesty that makes it impossible to patronise. But they also specialise in moments of breath-taking beauty that assert the sheer power of their skills. There are images I won't forget: the impossible poignancy and strangeness, for example, of Ganesh, dressed in a business suit, standing before Hitler, who is played by Simon in a ridiculous knitted Hitler costume. Or an evocation of Indra's net, when a back curtain of stars was lifted to reveal a blazing light, like a sunrise. I've never seen anything like this show, because only Back to Back could make it. They are, simply, our most important independent theatre company.
I ventured to the frozen wasteland that is Aberdeen on Wednesday to see if Hearts could extend their recent good run over Aberdeen. The salient points of the evening were:
This Sunday is the Skaters Care event in Ontario, California from 3:30-6:30 at the Citizens Business Bank Arena. If you haven’t gotten tickets yet to this event, try to fit it into your weekend schedule. Not only will you be treated to some great skating by some formidable talents but your money will go to help the relief efforts in Japan.
While it’s not easy for anyone to find a job in the current economy, people with hearing loss have additional hurdles to overcome. According to the Hearing Loss Association of America, many people who have difficulty hearing can feel anxious about applying and interviewing for a job. This makes advance preparation essential.
Mein Kampf is banned in the Netherlands. France last week criminalized the denial of the Armenian genocide in Turkey (an act that resulted in widespread condemnation by the OIC, whose Secretary General, Ekmeleddin Ihsanoglu, had the audacity, days after the ratification of 16/18, to bluster that those who defend cartoons that mock Mohammed as “freedom of thought and expression” have no business limiting the speech of those who deny the Armenian genocide. “This is an indisputable and unacceptable paradox,” he declared). And so on.
On my last visit to the Upper Street outpost (to watch AFL with Meister) a psychotic customer took off his shirt and beating his tattoed chest screamed at his barfly companion that he was going to "rip his face off". The manager, without a moment of hesitation said "look mate. I've told you before... Do it again and your barred". What would you have to do to get barred from a Walkabout? Actually rip his face off?
That phrase (mens sana in corpore sano) has got to be the first foreign language words I learned since it's stuck in my head all thru the years. You know what they say, "teach them when they're young, and they'll never forget."
Since everything beautiful in her life derives its beauty from its connection to Kṛṣṇa, Kuntī wants to have no affection for any of it, if Kṛṣṇa leaves it. In other words she asks for full realization that Kṛṣṇa is the source of beauty and sweetness in everything beautiful and sweet.
meet jaqs - mcgregor volleyball team or sacred order of the round orb.
but I still want
Founder Jason Chapman says money has been put down as rent on the new spot in Belleplain, a location in the northern Cape May/Cumberland County area perhaps more familiar to the Garden State's camping, fishing and hunting crowd who flock to the state forest there.
Here are the facts of the story I read this morning as gleaned from several news sources including CBS News, The Washington Post and Yahoo News. Trayvon Martin was 17 years old. He lived with his mother in Miami. Last month, Trayvon went to visit his father who lives in a gated community in Orlando. One day, Travyon Martin went to the store to get his younger brother a bag of skittles. On his way back home Trayvon was shot dead by the armed captain of the Neighborhood Watch within the gated community where his father resided.
Please note: This blog Hop is open until midnight, SA time!
~Author Unknown
But the extremes go both ways. If a good character is too good, they make us want to hate them for being too good.
I also really love the character design. Chitanda is the prettiest girl of the season and she has a great personality to go along with it. Oreki is pretty lucky to have her join the classical literature club; hopefully there will be a future romance. Both Oreki and Fukabe are very interesting. I like how Oreki leads a low-energy lifestyle, sounds kind of like me except for he really takes it to the extreme. Fukabe is a database for the most useless knowledge, which should add some comedy to the series later on.
As many of you know, this worldview is leading to the destruction of our planet.
Acts 22:18
Chana Masala-Chickpea Curry
And on Tuesday, the advertising executive Edie Stevenson passed away. She wrote the well-remembered TV commercial for Quaker cereal, "Three Brothers" in which the older boys conspire to use the youngest brother as a guinea pig when their mother serves a new breakfast cereal. “Let’s get Mikey. He won’t eat it. He hates everything.” Then the best line, "He likes it! Hey, Mikey!"
Why the Siren Likes It: Another masterpiece, a fisheyed look at the Washington influence game, usually taken as a riff on Alger Hiss but full of other echos as well. The scenes of back-door-dealing and blackmail ring as true as they ever did. Those tempted to tag the young, upright conservative senator's operatic torment over his gay attractions as quaint should think back to Jim McGreevey, Larry Craig and their many brethren--not to mention their wives. Despite the Red Scare trappings (and those are somewhat back in fashion, if you've noticed), Advise and Consent is one hell of a prescient movie. (To see just how prescient, the Siren recommends you check out this article by Meredith Hindley, senior writer at Humanities, on "The Transformation of Advise and Consent.") The above is from Ways of Seeing, whose proprietor clearly has excellent taste; for more screen grabs to show just how good this movie is, please click over and check out the rest.
OH later explained that this was really hard, as he didn't want to buy me a kit, but couldn't find one website that sold everything. Likewise he found difficulty in find a suitable mix of wool so settled on 5 shades of brown!
I served the cheesecake with a drizzle of chocolate syrup and
The average American will probably not know what the hell a kohlrabi is. Kohlrabi is also known as an italian turnip and I find it absolutely delicious. To me, the texture is almost like a soft, juicy daikon radish and the flavor is almost a sweet broccoli stem taste with slight hints of apple. But of course that’s just me.
A few weeks ago I got on the phone with luxury interior designer Sandra Espinet. Sandra is an absolutely fantastic interior designer, and a sweet and genuine person who I've loved getting to know over the past few months. She has the absolute dream job of living and working in Cabo San Lucas, a small island off the coast of Mexico with just 40,000 inhabitants. She also just started a brand new blog bringing all of us into her world of luxury interior design. I am excited to bring you today's Style Talk interview with such an accomplished designer (Sandra was named Designer of the Year by California Home & Design Magazine in 2010!) who has a unique perspective living and working in one of the most beautiful places in the world.
Dr. Ahmad Al-Tayeb: These fatwas on women’s issues were not issued by Al-Azhar. There is not a single Al-Azhar scholar who claims that it is permissible for women to lead men in prayer. Al-Azhar has always taught that women cannot lead men in prayer, but there is nothing wrong with leading women in prayer. These things are meant to cause confusion, and to undermine social and religious stability in Islamic societies.
PS 1) Stavros Dimas will not be a candidate in MP elections.
And the girl on the beach is an English Prime Minister’s daughter
But every time I read about another Christianized version of Iron John, I can’t help but think of the words of Saint Paul:
Hands - small heart to heart trimmed down on the thumb side
Very small picky things which I suppose goes with the territory when looking at something as hyped as Killzone 2.
Moreover, Mathira works in an industry where there are, probably, dozens of incidents of female sexual harassment; she works for a capitalist structure that cashes in on her sexual appeal and allows space for her personal enrichment, but where most women will remain working at the lowest wages, and doing double days. So what is Mathira makes her way groggily to a celebrity after party? Her sisters are still neck deep in poverty.
The cheerless colourlessness,
White batter:
I spent yesterday at the Great Arizona Beer Festival. I couldn't think of a better way to spend a Saturday. Great people, great weather, and great beer. Another beerfest to remember.
- white buttercream icing
At this moment I cannot help but pray for the Japanese people who were affected by the earthquake in any degree to find peace in their heart soon and sustain strength to survive the current situation.
for the rest of his life behind bars. By the story, this 15 year old
Over all, I have to say Tom’s trip to the Coulee Region was a rememberable one and I expect them both to come back in the near future.
I received two great cookbooks for Christmas: Jamie Oliver’s Meals in Minutes and Jacques Pepin’s Complete Techniques. My goal is to cook from Jamie’s book during the week and do something challenging from Pepin’s book on the weekends. So far I’ve had great success with Jamie’s book. Tasty meals on the table within 30 minutes. Which on busy weeknights is awesome. Will start blogging them this week.
Panning plays an important part in “Rascal” in that the first few vocal harmonics hold a main focus on the right channel of the song, which allows for a rhythmic synthesizer to capture the focus of the left channel (though it’s not really all that panned), and the later background vocals to throw themselves to the opposite position of the stereo image where the original “hmm..” voices are placed. Throughout the first verse we hear this sort of open space technique to mixing present itself during the second background phrase in which Jonna Lee sings “leaving is what you do” through the left channel, while a rising, quick-synth drone fades in through the opposite side of the mix and a shooting-synth throws itself from the right side, quickly spacing itself out to the left as the chorus hits.
I like to fish for Bass too..using a top water bait in May or Early June..Bass are kinda feisty and they will hit the bait as soon as it hits the water and then fight for their freedom. My experience with Bass is that they are always have little black spots on their bellies and are wormy..so I always have caught them and then released them back into the lake.
“And this is his commandment, That we should believe on the name of his Son Jesus Christ, and love one another, as he gave us commandment.”
to go with the linen slipcovered sofa. To order the sofa in the fabric you can wipe boogers, snot and dirt off of, was more than I wanted to spend, given my track record with sofas.
After years together
yeah, i remember those days. (i still have those scrapbooks. they're filled to the brim with stuff from my life in highschool. i loved them.)
They come, oh watch, they come
(I’m singing my blues)
From seeming evil works to good for me.
Who are YOU??
This one wasn’t even close…
Well, since I'm boringly pictureless, let's hear from you, dear Ballroom dancers! What are your favorite things about Autumn, or favorite ways to enjoy it? When I was in Kentucky, I loved the look of the black almost-bare branches against the soft grey sky. In fact I have an entire faerie clan based on that image, in my books (the crow fae). Another fun thing is, of course, all the new varieties of coffee and tea and whatnot that come out around this time of year!
Now, to the well-balanced mind, such ideologies should be avoided like the plague, but the liberal/left appear to have embraced them both. The European Union is run by Communist manqués and they are utilising Europe’s new Nazi Party, Islam, to further their dream of absolute power.
Yehia Mohamed, a former army officer, said, “America meddled in Egypt’s judicial system by allowing the release of the accused Americans. The ambassador is helping Israel destroy Egypt.”The often heard interpretation of everything that has happened in the past year as being part of a cunning US and Israeli plot. Though these quotes leave out both Iran and the Freemasons, who are sometimes also invoked. (I know: why would the US and Israel scheme to bring the Muslim Brotherhood to power? Ah, but if it makes no sense at all, that proves just how insidious a plot it really is.)
her dress.
We didn't buy the car but ended up as proud owners of the cookbook!
1/4th tsp pf dried chili flakes
Now, if I could just finish the other corner of the room before baby arrives... Since it's 95% done though, we're in good shape, and I hope to share a post or two with you each day for the next few days as we count down to his arrival!
Who has given me anything that I need to pay back? Everything under heaven is mine.
The irony was hardly lost on me. That happened to be my father’s specialty and almost exclusive area of practice. Years back, eye doctors in Charlotte sent their patients fifty miles north to the little town of Shelby to see the country eye doctor who just happened to have studied at Johns Hopkins and had a national reputation.
Wow, things have been quiet around here! December kind of just got away from me there. There was the usual craziness with present shopping, work, social events and also some frantic sewing too. While I have been quiet on the blog, I have been busy with some secret projects, including my very first tutorial!
My latest excursion yielded a haul of 22 books, with many gorgeous hardcovers among them, including “Gnomes” and “Secrets of the Gnomes”, both by Will Huygen. This brings my current book total to 735, not counting the 10 comic books I've got coming in the mail, gorgeous reprints of old comics the majority of them. I'm pretty set on holding a party the day I reach 1000 books. I might get crafty and make book related goodies for my friends, and have a pile of Bookcrossing books to give away, too. =)
I feel so conscious of the passage of time, I want to hold onto every second I have, but they keep slipping away, sometimes flashing past. HEY STOP!!!! I want to yell. But even if I did my voice would be carried away on the wind.
CD1:
We've already picked a winner by random generator and are awaiting confirmation of sale from Books of Wonder. We will announce the winner on Monday of next week.
I'm a black ocean, leaping and wide,
Today, it’s all about gossipy gossiping. There’s an entire summer ahead of us, and all we’ll have to replace the warm embrace of Premiership fixtures is the boney fingers and unwelcoming arms of transfer speculation. Whether it be the impending saga of Robin van Persie’s contract, or the interminable stories that’ll fly about like crazed geese; settle in folks, we are just at the beginning.
In the Country of the Young, by Lisa Carey
Okay, the slaw isn't literally made of apples, it just contains some apples. This is the way my mom always made it (she added raisins, too), and it's the way I like a basic cabbage slaw. A nice, creamy mayo-vinegar-sugar dressing, shredded cabbage and chopped apples. Yum.
However, his owner was very impressed with Ladd (woohoo) and was shocked to hear that he is in fact, sixteen this year. Most people put him at about eight years old. I’m pretty proud of him. Okay, and maybe myself a little bit for keeping him muscled well and fit. Here are a few pictures of my handsome man.
Patricia Cohen’s article sheds light on a new computer process that is able to search every single British book published in English during the so-called Victorian era (language analysis and fainting salts? I’m in). This means 1,681,161 texts were analyzed and searched for words that will supposedly shed light on the sentiments and concerns of the 19th century.
*wait for it*
And another ended with, 'Just be true, in any sense you wish. Life is a ride, bloody enjoy it.'
It was always a dream of my Sister’s to one day win the womens category of this race. So for some reason I have this ideal that it is some sort of benchmark.
Gault Rennow +2 crit +10
And so, as the montage ends, all five dogs once again gather in the long grass. Moon is soaked!
4) Even though love alone can't save a broken child, never give up on him.
While Achtung Baby has, for a while now, become the consensus “Best/Favorite” U2 album (itself a contrary opinion once upon a time), The Joshua Tree is the pinnacle and quintessential U2 effort, an epic rock album and certainly the best album by this hate-’em-if-ya-want-to legendary band. The two albums certainly represent not only the band’s peak, but also the collective moment when they pivoted. One of my favorite Bono quotes is his description of Achtung Baby as “four men chopping down The Joshua Tree.”
It's frustrating to know where you want to go but to not be able to get there when you want to despite careful planning and through no fault of your own. I've enjoyed seeing the sights along the scenic route, but I'm ready to be at my destination now. Surely we must be close. Are we there yet???
"Dead Man Walking" is slang used by prison guards when escorting death row prisoners from their cells to the execution chambers. Dead Man Walking is also the title of a 1995 film starring Sean Penn.
Carnivore
she is talking loud and clear.
- Will you marry me? How about my brother?
if you won’t use commas, period, ‘than’ your opinion doesn’t matter
Cross Jesmond Dene Road opposite the Banqueting Hall and enter a small copse by the wooden gate provided. The copse, a small Dene formed by the course of a stream called the Moor Crook Letch, contains the remains of the Chapel of Our Lady of Jesmond or St. Mary's Chapel. The oldest church or chapel in Newcastle, this was probably built by the Grenville family, one-time Lords of Jesmond, early in the 12th Century, from which date are the remains of the pillars of the chancel arch.
Oh there’s so much to choose from. But I have chosen. Oh yes. Now, only the slightly easy task of persuasion now:
NFL Comparison: Wes Welker
It was quite unique, as I guess the beach was directly in line with the landing strip for the airport, so we saw about 100 of these in the 2 hrs we were there.
By Lifehouse
836. French Fries @ Monkey Wrench (Louisville, KY) 8:56 p.m.
the thing inside me, that brings forth the disease,
Biographyby
It is often at this point that the hero receives a talisman, an object of magical value which represents his authority to go on the quest and which also helps him. Theseus had his father’s sword. Luke had his father’s Light Sabre. In the western genre, the talisman is often a gun. Mattie has her father’s Colt Dragoon. Rango gets a gun, too. So does P.K., but his real talisman is his father’s “detective button”. Sometimes the talisman has magical abilities, but its greatest power is what it symbolizes, an important aspect of the hero’s destiny.
Yeah, well, ignoring the fact that the banks GODDAMN WEREN'T SUCCESSFUL AT ALL and in fact were in financial trouble, only getting their asses pulled out of the cellophane by OUR DAMN MONEY.
My girlfriend has exposed me to a few (non-RPG) games lately, and I've really taken to the very laid-back Aquarius card game, but sadly, the game is apparently no longer in production. :( --Guillotine, too, is fun, but a bit too fiddly for my tastes in an non-RP game. Red Dragon Inn is still in deliberation, as it was only the two of us playing, and I definitely got the feeling it would show its 'worth' in a multi-player session, so I'll give that a try before giving it a rating.
Then use soap and water to clean the discs.
If I so choose.
to unbutton
Here is what our fire department posted on their website about the incident:
AMBER DIPIETRA Reviews
and, darling, i found that lying in bed
The creation of the ancient Adamic race was accompanied by the formation of dark rain clouds that gathered in the heavens. It must have truly been a fearful time for the dark-skinned pre-Adamites way back in those ancient days, --- considering that this strange occurrence was also accompanied by unfamiliar angry voices speaking from the heavens in the form of thunder and lightning.
On 24th February 1981, a beautiful young woman called Lady Diana Spencer got engaged. To the Prince of Wales. So far, so public knowledge....
Last weekend, I attended my second Left Coast Crime conference, held in Sacramento, California. Although some might have grumbled about the rainy weather, when I go to a conference, I expect to be attending sessions during the scheduled event, not sightseeing, so it didn't bother me at all. (Not enough time to extend the trip, so it was conference-only for me)
with 23-year lady broadcaster; appeals for privacy
Plain chocolate- 200 gms + enough for grating
BENONI: Elderly couple in their seventiesfound murdered in Masefield Street.
Day 12
Emraan Hashmi has copied underworld don Dawood Ibrahim’s style and looks in the film. Initially it was decided to take Prachi Desai as the female lead actress in the film but finally Director Kunal Deshmukh offered Esha Gupta to get in. His belief is that she will be more sensual on screen. Esha, a former Miss India International has also graced the Kingfisher calendar twice. The soundtrack is composed by Pritam Chakraborty.
(New York, NY)— On April 11, 2012, multiple media sources reported that a “working group” has been formed inside New York State Attorney General Eric Schneiderman's office, with the purpose of reviewing the New York City Police Department’s (NYPD) stop-and-frisk policy. Reportedly, the working group was formed to analyze data— including ethnic and racial breakdowns of those searched— to determine whether a more comprehensive analysis of the policy is necessary.
via taret
21.Skip James / Special Rider Blues
1 he'd
The missile has a range of 5,000 kilometres, a marked improvement over India’s current missiles which can hit potential enemy targets over a distance of just 3,500 kilometres.
Allow me to suggest three simple yet
It is no secret that our eating habits change as the school week ends and the weekend begins. A 2003 study funded by the USDA found that the consumption of fat, calories, and alcohol is, on average, higher Friday through Sunday than during the week. Weekdays are structured while our weekend schedules are more variable, changing the timing of our meals. Weekends often include social engagements–such as pizza night or creamees at the waterfront–that dictate our food choices.
I know I wax lyrical about the white, fluffy stuff, and nothing will ever change my love of pristine snow......but there is something about those hardy little crocus flowers that warms my heart....and I do actually love Spring, even though she can be a fickle season, here in North West England.
30-Where would you most like to be right now?
Before we go any further, therefore, we are entitled to know what has been going on. Simply being expected to throw more money at this system isn't good enough.
What happens when I start hating my daily routine?
I want to see my granddaughters at least get settled into Secondary school. I want to share in the joys of their new house. I want to be able to do things with them again.
There are days when feeling shoots into her face and fingers and toes, and she offers praise to God for small steps- but never the less- steps towards being Well. Small things like Putting on her own Boot don't discourage her. Its natural for us to think "Wow I cant believe I am getting excited about being able to put my own shoe on".. But Marissa knows that this is milestone. She is praising and rejoicing.
Look Elite Academy Graduates present
WILLOUGHBY
The White House has taken up an interest in wind energy developments in the Great Lakes regions as of last month. The goal is to plant windmills in the Great Lakes in order to gain wind energy from the lake winds. This could be a pioneering break through for Michigan because electricity would become more economically accessible. Launched in the water last week in the middle of Lake Michigan was a yellow buoy that will be used to measure and collect data from wind at different heights. Although this project has finally taken off, it faced difficulties and still is under the threat of being shut down due to lack of financial resources. $1.3 million that was originally supposed to come from a state grant through the Michigan Public Service Commission was cancelled by a court ruling last year. Despite this devastating draw back on funding, the buoy was launched and built on $1.2 million from the Department of Energy along with $250,00o from a Wisconsin utility. As of currently this buoy is one of two in the North American region and could be at risk of being docked by 2013 because of lack of funding. Grand Valley State University has reached out to the University of Michigan, Michigan State and Michigan Technological universities for aide in collecting research over the Great Lakes. This research includes the studying and tracking of flight patterns for birds and bats so that the turbines aren’t build in areas that put these animals in danger.
I've also started buying #10 cans of grain, and we got our first water barrel!
You can be free. You can work out what God has already worked in.
I mean, I hit 50,000 words with a few days to spare, but all of my research went out the window right away, in every sense. I don’t think I used any of it at all. And while I technically finished Mortality, it was so awful that I couldn’t even bring myself to take them up on their offer of a free self-published copy as a trophy. It wasn’t fit to be professionally bound, or even printed off of a personal printer and stapled together. It was crap.
In another smaller bowl, stir together the vanilla, milk, and oil.
Ohhh, but what if you had done this?
Eureka! I found it! More chocolate of course!!
Please donate what you can. Together we can do this! Every donation will help in this important cause! Neil is counting on us to come through for him!
And if you ever need a AWESOME IT guy.. Stephen is the man!! stephen@wyldwebdesigns.com
(11) I am the good shepherd. The good shepherd gives His life for the sheep. (12) But a hireling, he who is not the shepherd, one who does not own the sheep, sees the wolf coming and leaves the sheep and flees; and the wolf catches the sheep and scatters them. (13) The hireling flees because he is a hireling and does not care about the sheep.
My seventh grade math teacher was yet another victim of my evil mind, but really as you will see it was her own fault.
There are many different social networking websites on the internet and each of them have different features that they offer. With these sites you can meet new people and make new friends as well connect with potential customers for your business. One very effective method of marketing your business with social networking is with a social networking blog.
There is one last individual I would like to introduce to your imagination. His name was Glen and he was the home owner/general contractor of the Scottsdale home where I met many of these characters. Glen was the person who had hired us all through CLP to fix up the home which he had just purchased for his family. I got the impression he did not intend for it to be their long-term residence but rather for it to be an investment. Glen had been a working man previously. If I remember correctly he had been a cabinetmaker earlier in his life, but he had definitely moved into the white-collar world by the time I met him. To clarify, I do not mean to imply that “white-collar” is a bad thing, I only want to point out that Glen had transitioned from one to the other. Glen was not at ease. He was feeling the stress of his investment and counting the dollars as each day passed with him paying the salary of anywhere from 5 to 10 individuals. He also seemed to have a condescending view towards those of us who obviously couldn’t afford to drive Mercedes SUVs or even to provide ourselves with decent housing. He wasn’t openly haughty, just unconsciously superior. At one point he discovered that I had a college degree and his attitude towards me changed for the better. I found this to be true on a number of occasions while I worked for CLP. When it was discovered that I had gone to college I was treated with more respect and consideration, whether or not I had yet proved myself to be worthy of it. Like the rest of the people I have described in this short series, Glen passed from my life as quickly as he came into it. We finished the job. His family moved in. I helped him carry in one of their couches without charging him for it (which was hard for him to believe), and we parted ways forever.
Another way that homeschoolers are more enmeshed is that we often have to do work with organizations or deliver programs to groups of kids, not just our kid. Thus as a volunteer in the past with Cub Scouts and Boy Scouts I felt I had a large stake in the activity. It was my story not just my kid's story. We are a Scout family, pure and simple. When I share that a son made his Star Rank, only an involved Scout parent would realize that a certain level of parental involvement was required, if only to get the kid to and from the meetings and to volunteer with the Troop to help "make it go" as Scouting says.
We got to show him some of our favorite Tokyo places, made him eat all of our favorite foods, and because our apartment is huge (Tokyo-huge, that is) he could stay in our tatami room.
The Kensington Hotel, has started a one-hour dining etiquette classes for ages 5 to 10.
And my family always had to get
nor is their sin concealed from my eyes.
She paid what must have been a least a thousand dollars to have two men come out, and drain the dilapidated pool filled with algae and leaves. They removed and replaced the pump and filter. Sandblasted the lining , and refilled the pool. On top of that they put one of those fancy automatic vacuums in. Within a week the pool started to grow dingy again. The water dropped below the basket level and for weeks the new pump was left to run automatically sucking in air as there was not enough water in the pool which continued to degrade. Last night I came home to find the water hose turned on, and left in the pool again. The pool was filled to the top and starting to overflow. I thought I about turning it off. I even thought about calling the Landlord, but what's the point she stopped responding to email, texts, and phone calls months ago, so I let it run.
Again, he suggested that the developer was spending the money.
Due to a lack of transportation, I've been holed up in the house today. Boooooo-ring! With nothing apart from a marathon of Project Runway to keep me mildly amused, I found myself rummaging through my wardrobe and re-discovering old favorites. Top of my finds was this Phillip Lim black V-neck jumper, with an unusual back in the form of a line of buttons, which when opened reveals a nude coloured sequin panel. (gotta love those sequins).
The words we speak, along with the manner in which we say them, give insight into our spirituality and what kind of character we possess. Have you ever heard other Christians, who try to defend their harsh demeanor, or harmful speech by saying “I can’t help it, I have always been that way” as if to mean God created them that way and they cannot change! Followers of Christ ought to be the most mannerly, respectful, and kind individuals in the way they talk to one another and their fellow man.
-FREE Gillette Fusion ProGlide Shave Prep wyb Cartridge, (P&G 07/31/11)
to be pictured with this gorgeous face!
There's a lot of great collaboration brews out there, but they are almost always these big, strong beers full of heavy flavors. Driven by enthusiasm, and quite possibly ego and one upmanship, brewers in these collaborations have produced many memorable, arresting, and unforgetable brews, but sometimes I wish they would just dial these collaboration beers down a little. A couple collaborations have been as ablut subtle and enjoyable as getting popped in the mouth with a sledge hammer. So had I known Kaleidoscope was a nine-brewery collaboration, I would've figured it being some obscenely high alcohol over-hopped palate shattering mess and avoided it like the plague
Fact Three: The government knows what subjects children need to learn.
But we were walking on the beach with friends from a boat called Mangoe who we hadn’t seen in 15-years. The last time we saw them was… Well that was the thing. None of us could exactly recall the last time we were together. Maybe La Cruz, maybe Barra, maybe somewhere else. And as we reminisced over our escapades we
Then, from downstairs she heard the urgent sound of her mother’s voice, “Hannah, time to start the day.”
#5 The numbers came out horrible ( how do you all do it ??!!) #6 The square that the numbers are inside came out all whacky and not square...Do I tear that out and re-do? #7 Almost forgot...I only have a hoop, no frame, so do I spend the money on a frame ? I don't see myself givng it up anytime soon so...?? Ok, like I said, I don't want to beat myself up toooooo bad , but at the same time, where do I draw the line at being particular, and giving myself a pass on perfection for the sake of enjoying the self-teaching/learning process. ?? There you have my weekend...lol
The kids cheered an appearance by the first family’s dog, Bo, and leapt out of their seats to pet him.
In the end…
Contrary to popular belief, there weren’t all that many Noirs of the classic period that featured a private detective as the hero, however, Henry Hathaway’s 1946 movie does. Galt is a New York P.I. who was double-crossed by his ex-partner. When the partner turns up in town and the police call around to warn Galt not to cause any trouble, you can be sure just what’s coming. Or can you?
Who does sisters better than Jane Austen? Elinor and Marianne was even the original title for Sense &
So, a business needs a mission statement. Which was news to me – sounds silly, I know, but I had been operating under the general principles that all businesses in the world had basically the same aims in mind. The primary idea would be:
I am going through a crisis of faith, I guess would be the best way to describe it. It is not my first and I highly doubt it will be my last. I am doubting myself as a writer. I know I will not stop writing – I have tried ( tried and failed? tried and died!) it didn’t go well.
“You know something,” Serena whispered. “I think I’m gonna be okay with leaving my mom here, because I’ll always have you guys. Forever.”
FOX 11′s Angela Kelly spent Wednesday morning with Miller, the students who created his special vehicle and representatives of Easter Seals Wisconsin to learn more about how all of this came together.
I clung to the roof, while John bravely ventured to the edge of the stage to help the second guide rotate the entire mechanism around the vertical axis, demonstrating how they adjust for different wind directions.
I’m home tonight. It took me quite a while to figure out how I wanted my blog to look (ms. perfectionist as one of my inspirations would say) but I finally decided to just be satisfied with it I can always change it later. My dog sits on the couch currently on my mother’s lap. She wants to go to bed and we will soon. I take sleep meds and unfortunantly this limits my late night activity time. However, in the meantime Shona is looking me with pitiful, sleep filled brown eyes.
Level 24: MP Cost: 70, Damage: 262%, Attacks up to 6 enemies 6 times, 34% chance to stun the enemy for 6 seconds.
we will miss her greatly
If the day comes when my obituary is displayed before your eyes, and my writings are in some way publicized for you to see, I ask that you remember this: April 10, 2012, you told me everything that I did need.
That's it! This was really easy and really good. I served mine with mashed potatoes, mushrooms, and onions caramelized with worcestershire sauce.
(How do I introduce the most beautiful little lady, …our peach, …our muse, …our new meaning for living?)
This is a great time though to go through all your alts (first of every month) and assess if you even still want them, and if not, nuke them.
1 1/2 cups buttermilk, at room temperature
Merrell: Ew.
The plot thickening, folks….this might mean they planning to go to a full trial. Kuchoorments and La Cooray!
More from today´s article, paragraph nine:
Wow! Wooden sure does think about anal sex an awful lot. I suspect he probably owns a butt plug of his own. Forgive me for injecting actual truth here, but heterosexuals engage in anal sex as well! I did not realize that people’s sex lives was any of Wooden’s business. I suppose he isn’t interested in being troubled by any medical facts while he spews out his lies and exaggerations; those pesky facts are so troublesome when you have hate to spread.
“When I was a young bank teller, I was a wallflower,” Bolger once said, “ No girl would dance with me, because they never knew what the next step would be and neither did I.” So he turned those crazy long “rubberlegs” into a virtue, developing a style of dancing that seemed to defy both the laws of physics and of common sense.
Our Times’ special Labour Day edition will be heading to press shortly.
A challenge, or two:
Without a lot of extra money to buy different types of sneakers, it is most important to me that a sneaker is durable. These ones have been. As a result, I have only had to buy 1 new pair of running shoes this year. This is a methodology which I will continue no matter what anyone says. The NB’s have sold me on this. They have saved me a bunch of money and allowed me to train healthy and injury free for close to a year now. They have most certainly kept me running strong and without a doubt running cheap. So again, thank You New Balance 480s for keeping me on the road and in the gym every day, upright and training hard.
Since that day I have managed to rip open my heel on a pair of winter boots, but, as it isn't healing and it hurts like hell I am trying to take care of it with the goal of beginning again on Monday. Fingers crossed that I will "heel" in time! This was actually one of the warmest weeks we have had and I was so excited to run. In previous weeks our run days seemed to land on -20 celsuis weather, so this week would have felt balmy by comparison! It has, however, been somewhat of a blessing that the heel catastrophe landed this week as my IBS has flared up for a reason unbeknownst to me. With any luck I will be able to get both issues in check before next week.
Ending: B+
Anyways, life isn’t bullshit. It’s full of SUPPLIES!…es.
If it is covered up then we need to start asking ourselves how many other stories like this are being covered up, how many other rape gangs are operating in our country and also how we are going to get the publicity to warn parents and children about the dangers in their midst.
Isa 11:1: And there shall come forth a rod out of the stem of Jesse, and a Branch shall grow out of his roots: 2 And the spirit of the LORD shall rest upon him, the spirit of wisdom and understanding, the spirit of counsel and might, the spirit of knowledge and of the fear of the LORD;
Meg Pokrass writes flash fiction, poetry and makes animation--and her new book, Damn Sure Right (great title, right?) is absolutely wonderful. Her work has appeared in over 100 online and print publications from the Rumpus to the Mississippi, and she runs the incredible Fictionaut Five author series. Nominated for Dzanc's Best of The Web, the Pushcart Prize Anthology and more, she also teaches writing privately. I was honored to interview her for the blog.
Now grab the button and link-up your Fitness Friday posts to share about your fitness journey! And if you have a moment...take some time to visit the links below and spread the love by encouraging these other awesome ladies that are joining in!
Deep breaths.
Do note that this is for any organization of any sort that has a bureaucracy. When your organization has no set org chart or it is set just as boxes and not as absolute numbers of personnel, the bureaucracy will expand. An unbounded bureaucracy is the kiss of death to any organization as it will lose the goal of that organization and soon be run for the bureaucrats, alone.
Hope you have a blessed week!
They know what to do. Do you?
Put one third of the mixture into one of the prepared tins then colour the remaining two thirds with pink colouring, a few drops at a time, until you get the pink colour you want. Divide this mixture between the other two tins.
Maybe it was the fact that he was 32 now, and maybe it was the handful of Christmases spent listening to his mother groan she would never have any grandchildren to spoil. Perhaps it was the comfort of having someone warm, soft – endlessly available – next to him in the bed. Maybe it was the easy way she held a baby, perching it perfectly on her womanly hips, which made him want it so bad. She didn’t know much about children, but already he could see that she was born to be a mother. And he believed it was his path to be a father, not that he was sure that he’d even be any good at it.
“We were impressed with Panini Authentic’s commitment to authenticity and their ability to reach our most avid fans to deliver our game-worn memorabilia,” said Dallas Mavericks Owner Mark Cuban. “Our fans should be excited to have access to these exclusive items. We look forward to a great partnership with Panini.”
These flavors individually would enhance most brown ale, together they allow heavier beers, flavored beers and barley wines to refresh the pallet for more of the flavors of the potato treat.
Giving Sadie time to stand
A platform to showcase designers’ upcoming spring/summer collections, fashion week attracts international attention from media, bloggers and global fashion buyers and has been the launch pad for many Australian fashion icons including Lisa Ho, Zimmermann, Alex Perry and Collette Dinnigan.
The creeks and ponds are full again, that was good to see! There is more rain forecast for later this week, I hope that the forecast is correct for a change. That goes for the weekend as well, it is still looking good for a kayaking trip in Ludington State Park!
OPVs have been phased out in western countries because of their high incidence of adverse side effects. This type of vaccine was developed by Dr. Albert Sabin and FDA approved in 1963. The viruses in this vaccine are not dead. They are merely “attenuated” but still alive.
His time and energy was so appreciated to help me make this space the talk of tinsel town! The vision he has to create out of simple pieces of driftwood is quite inspiring. I was so honored when he accepted my invitation to come be the featured artist.
“Pooh! Screw your mum! This is the twenty-first central Emma, not the fifteenth. Like there are such things as faeries!”
Cook had lived for a few years in Nashville, and had no doubt seen Andrew Jackson’s home, “The Hermitage,” which had a two-story central block with pillared porticos across the front and back and one-story wings to either side. The Texas Governor’s Mansion was originally to have these one-story wings as well, which certainly would’ve provided much-needed space for entertaining, but for budgetary reasons the wings were never built.
Apart from rotor of electric motor all parts are stationary. So it has less frictional loss, less noise and vibration. Since motor adjust torque automatically, no need of clutch and gear box. There is no power loss while the vehicle is stopped in traffic jam and signals. If we put regenerative breaking system, then we can re-capture 30% of power needed for breaking. It is used to recharge the battery.
Anyone who knows me well willl tell you how much I lurves myself a good meal. I mean, it's no secret. Just look at the lateral spread of my ass and you can tell that. But what I'm talking about here right now is a meal that's prepared by other humans in an intriguing and comfortable setting that has something interesting and/or artisitic about it that makes it truly special.
Oh, and I can't drink a bottle without this going on in my head.
One of the things that really frustrates me about photographing the moon is getting the camera settings right. OK, it’s not that big a deal but every time you touch a big zoom lens to make an adjustment there’s a degree of shake introduced, even with exposure delay set to on there’s still a chance the camera won’t have settled by the time you take a shot. It’s tempting when experimenting with exposures on a subject like the moon just to quickly change the shutter speed and hit the remote, especially if there’s cloud in the equation where exposure times can change from second to second. What you invariably get are shots that look ok on the preview but on closer inspection are slightly blurred. No good to anyone.
So we can reasonably state that Najib has a dark cloud cast by the rakyat over his halo that BN has painstakingly tried to keep in place.
You’re a bull after all?!
* You must follow Create Me Pink (either follow our blog, facebook page, or subscribe to our mailing list).
"Kickin' It Old School" - 2:37
She believed that education about black people was important not only to promote pride in black children, but to promote understanding among all races.
Now, no one believes, how beautiful it was was here, ha, ha
futuristic funk-rock scorcher like "Big Stripey Lie". And she's got
"I apologize," she said in a phone interview. "I'm sure they didn't mean any harm but some people will take it offensive." She added that she "had an idea of who it was," based on the time of the receipt.
Students who eat breakfast tend to perform significantly better than those who don’t.
On the other hand, however, we seem to have bought the world’s disconnect between love and sex. We have a sort of prudishness that has always seemed to penetrate Christian thinking. Though we may deny that this is the case, it still appears to be that way among many even today. EROS is treated often as though it is something less than real love. Yes, there are books (Christian books) that deal with sex techniques, but even these seem to give the impression that sex is just a means to an end. Throw in the view of some that sex is mainly (if not exclusively) for procreation and we have made EROS less than it is and to a certain extent incompatible with AGAPE.
Till then, have a blessed weekend ahead. :)
And will give your heart to a dog to tear.
Yet a case in Williamson County, just north of Austin, is raising the ante. Michael Morton had been sentenced to life in prison for murdering his wife. He was released six months ago — 25 years after being convicted — when DNA testing proved he was not the killer.
I started quilting the baby quilt and in 1 hour it is half-way done....the quilting is placed about 1 inch apart. So about 20-25 rows were sewn. It did take a little tweaking but it is working.
And while I was going to write about the threat to the integrity of the musicians when confronted with a cesspool of washed up starlets looking like a bad acid flashback, I realized I’d rather not get too serious. I’ll leave that to you and the comments section if you like. Or, you can, like me, just enjoy the asshole parade that descends on this music festival every year without fail. It’s so embarrassingly funny to me.
Much thanks to the easter holidays for letting me breath for a bit and catch you all up!
"Mine."
Yesterday, my husband & I discussed what Screen-Free Week will mean for us. Unfortunately, it isn't logical to turn off all screens completely. Dea has to use the computer for her Writing class, since it's online. The Spanish she is supposed to be doing & the computer programming she claims to want to do both require the computer. If Jay decides to continue with either Spanish or computer programming, he'll need the computer. He also uses the computer to type his writing assignments. The DVD lessons are a big part of his Latin study and his ASL is currently entirely based on DVDs. I could just have them skip those subjects for that week, but I really don't want to. That seems irrational to me.
“One,” said Hank and Dee simultaneously for verification, just as they’d planned. “I break.” He loved to break because he had once sunk the 9-ball on a break, which is an instant win and, for Hank, instant manhood. Although he had never come close again, it was still a moment that he hadn’t let go. The break turned up empty, but the game was on.
Most of it was cut off the cob and frozen to be added to soups, stews , stir fry
Black clouds, writing or mechanical, can also be considered signs. I’m a great believer in signs. If my path is blocked, I take it as a signal that I should go another way. I don’t know who or what is sending that signal; it could be anything from my own subconscious to the great universe. Whatever the case, I’ve had enough experience ignoring signs that I try to listen.
James was on good form, but somewhat surprised and appalled to the reaction to the blog post on GBBF. He like me was disappointed with some of the bad language in some comments. Just because you disagree with someones decision is no reason to call them a bunch of C****. Chill out, have a beer. Your argument is more credible if you can make it with out resorting to language like that.
The steps to becoming a Queen are…
Don't worry
Round 1: Knit
Roshon Fegan was influenced by Michael Jackson and chose 1996, the first year he saw Michael Jackson on stage. Chelsie surprised him by having MJ's choreographer help him with some steps. He said he was doing Michael Jackson with a samba twist. Energetic and fun dance! Good job. Oddly he danced to a Jackson 5 song and wore a costume reminiscent of the 70s, Afro and all. Oh well. (25)
I was so excited to receive the email from Julianna asking me to join her is this new adventure!!
Thirty minutes later I returned to the kitchen and saw, with my own disbelieving eyes, at least half the broccoli still lying on the chopping board in its virgin state. A rant at Jeremy Vine too far, clearly. I am absolutely CRAP at being an Adult, I decided, scraping the abandoned broccoli into the soup pan and setting the dinger to go in another 30 minutes. By which time any nutrition in the veg would have been boiled to usefulness of wet cardboard. Mental state: Utterly pissed off.
9. Shows arrogant, haughty, patronising or contemptuous behaviours or attitudes.
The fifth student replied, “I ride my bicycle to ride my bicycle.” The teacher sat at the feet of the fifth student and said, “I am your student.”
MacPherson Member of Parliament Tin Pei Ling and her staff were ‘uncontactable’ when a needy resident tried calling her constituency office seeking for assistance, prompting him to lodge a complaint to Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong!
11/17/2008 - San Francisco, CA - The Fillmore
I know what you are thinking...WTF where the hail and hearty have you been? YOU SAID YOUD NEVER LEAVE US AGAIN.
2. Secondly, it is from what TRUTH is in the Pure Matter.
On a maternity room door.
There are two particular characters from The Raven Saga who would kick butt in the Hunger Games... and they just happen to be totally in love with each other: Tabitha and Zoltan. Tabitha is a changeling and Zoltan is a werewolf. Both are hard ass but adorable. They would so easily defend each other to the death (!).
in the wide open fields
“C’mon….”
10 - Unseen Terror
But let me go on.
Mmm, my eyes absorb the sight of your engorged shaft—blood rushing through it like lava building waiting to erupt at any moment like an extremely active volcano.
I was vaguely aware that advertising copywriters were the people who penned such great lines as “For mash get Smash” or “It’s not easy being a dolphin”. I soon found out a planner’s job was equally or even more interesting, devising the entire campaign strategy. I was pretty sure I knew what a publisher did but it sounded a little less glamorous so, liking the sound of the first two roles, I started applying to advertising agencies. I was instantly rewarded with interviews at all the best ones, but it turned out that, although I could write brilliant applications I was the world’s most rubbish interviewee.
- Be mindful to support urban designs appropriate for a winter city
the characters are two-dimensional, but that's okay, it's a satire! we don't know enough about the two leads to feel their situation has any real human gravity - but that's okay, it's what makes it cartoonish! cartoons are fun!
It’s not what you do, but why you do it that is important. True love is shown in actions, not empty words. True love forgives and always works to build up others, to choose what is best for them, not best for yourself. There are so many who seem blind to themselves, deluded they are all that in the church when the fruit of their lives reveals the truth.
The people who do have this disorder in the western world can develop strong psychological addictions to eating various Earthy substances and can crave rocks, mud or clay multiple times throughout the day. While searching for people who have written about their own experience with Geophagy I came across a forum where the writer mentioned that her addiction to eating rocks was more severe than her previous addiction to cigarettes (see the thread here). At first this person’s problem came across as a joke to me but there are dozens of replies from people who experience the same addiction and are seeking help for it.
Search Engine What you do when the bakkie won't go
It was just a thin slip of newsprint, wrapped into that batch of advertising circulars that comes with the Sunday newspaper. But it’s going to change my life for the better, more than Parade magazine ever could, more than Dilbert, more than the handsome tool shed now on sale at Lowe’s, more even than the offer of five two-liter Sprites for $4.
The luxury industry is responding in kind, moving decisively to extend its reach into Latin America’s biggest market to tap an energized generation of young people.
This is a fun opportunity to use some interesting (and pricey) exotic woods since I only need a board foot of each.
When I arrived at Florida State University to be a full-time PhD student as well as teach at the school, I was going to get my degree in 2-3 years, or so I thought. Fortunately (and unfortunately), I was quickly presented with some interesting career advancement opportunities (which I felt I’d be stupid to turn down), so I dropped to part-time status on the PhD. I followed this path of opportunity for 5 years, and I thought I could complete the degree while working full-time (not to mention being a mom to 2 kids). During that time, I also entered single motherhood… another story for another day!
The Gundam franchise is an excellent source for strong male characters and it’s no accident so many of them are fathers or surrogate fathers. Even if we’re unaware of it, as men, most things we do in life are measured and compared against the lives of our fathers if only by ourselves. As I looked at the two current flagship shows of Gundam, AGE & Unicorn, I see two very different perspectives on the same idea. Spoilers ahead!
But before I could say anything, Dianna sent another email. She said: “Don, this is not my story to write. It’s yours.”
As eager as I am to get rolling with this story, I want to make sure I commit to a look that I'll be happy with when I'm knee deep in pages. I also want to find a way to do this comic that doesn't take too long, because I work on it in my spare time.
* hem me in: so, so beautiful, told in piano notes and guitar chords. i was overwhelmed by this song and its emotions, i think, because i could relate so well with a past experience. can't we all? throw me overboard/i'll do my best/sink or swim, they say/gotta keep running/it's not enough/legs are failing/still you wrap around/to hem me in.
It should be safe to take a walk. But not here. Not anymore. Not for a while…
Work is going fine, it's going to be quite busy for the next few months, straight through summer, but extra hours means extra cash so I'm not complaining!
Then there is wretching. Damn, my hands are covered in food so I do a quick wash and turn around as N comes in all red and leaning over the tile floor coughing. He is my puker. He pukes if he coughs, when he cries too hard, if he gets something stuck in his throat. I have probably cleaned up 750 piles of puke in the four years since he colored my world (in fact, his sheets were simultaneously being washed from being puked on) and it sucks every time.
“There never were in the world two opinions alike, no more than two hairs or two grains; the most universal quality is diversity”
drowsy curled honeysuckles,
The physical appearance of the creature seems strange, and I will talk only about the body, not the dream casting abilities and the fascination his slumber evokes. Cthulhu is not easily comparable to anything folklore and fantasy fiction has ever produced. My claim which I defend here is that the shape of this creature does not succeed in evoking an alien appearance which Cosmicism promises. To be honest, I would have wished for such a disturbing sight. I cannot bear humans as protagonists in fantastic novels anymore. This misses the point of the Fantastic genre! Is the imagination of post Great War writers clouded? Until now, convincing monsters and alien civilizations have not been well outlayed in fiction or painting. After the time in the trenches, I wish to look at something beyond human understanding. Something familiar to my memories of the Ardennes. It is time to dissect the body of this sleeping half god.
rehabilitation, or to warm an area of the body prior to other therapies or exercise.
Over the next few weeks the 4 elementary schools will have their Spring Music Concerts at the Ridge PAC. For the first time, the elementary art teachers created a slideshow of elementary artwork to run before the concerts. What a fantastic way to advocate for the ARTS! Amazingly enough the presentation was created in Google Docs, each teacher added their own photos - no e-mailing photos or mailing CDs! Here is a preview...Enjoy!!!
Just recently I had a dream about the geometric shape of a box, or cube. And the odd thing was how this shape was relating itself to certain levels depression. It began with lines on a piece of paper, starting with just the sketching of a square. And me standing in the middle of the square. Just flat, on the ground. Very simple, like you know where the boundaries and lines are. You can outstretch your arms to feel them pass the barriers of the square . Familiar, and comfortable. Like knowing the reaches and capabilities of yourself. Staying grounded, not feeling to far or out of touch with whats going on, just enough to fall some and then remember how to get back where you were standing. But still remaining on the flattened box…
Park: Was I good?
Card stock: Core'dinations and American Crafts
We can, indeed, personally contribute to increasing our disasters or reducing their effects. Our choices are where our potential brilliance as a species lie. Each and every one of these choices are within our power and contribute to our individual and communal stability in uncertain times, regardless of the origin of them. Let’s all start getting a bit smarter in meeting our personal and collective concerns and in finding respectful relationships with each other in meeting our common causes.
Hmm, anything?
But what else do people drink in the Fall? I have a couple ideas of what I like.
the Jesuit faculty.
Rachel continued to ignore her. She clicked on one of her houses; saw the Smith family loading up.
Thus it is not too surprising that many Comstockers believed Twain's similar but greatly embellished account of a bloody suicide by Bowie knife. In fact, the article caused such horror and outrage that, Twain had to print this retraction the very next day:
1 shallot, sliced
Here are the same songs as above, but AFTER all the necessary steps have been completed.
We have put a fair amount of work in this week, job well done! Be well this weekend and ENJOY!!!
Obviously, the lack of an HDMI port or rear-facing camera is annoying, but there are other irritating aspects to the Acer Iconia Tab A200 as well. For example, getting the plastic cover that conceals the microSD card slot up is a test of patience as well as fingernails.
As I said, a lot of little pieces from a left-over bin under my crafting table.
Good morning it’s Tuesday, it’s question Tuesday. The day that I answer a real question from real nerd fighter. That’s right, just the one question. Hi, I’m a fifteen year old girl named Katie. No, you’re not, you’re John Green sitting slightly far away from the camera. Right, now I realize that but I’m quoting a me.
Maybe David had the right idea afterall.
But hunger is just one of many invisible clocks ticking down for this family. And those clocks start ticking a lot faster when an accidental fire sends smoke out the ventilation shaft up into the forest. It’s only a matter of time, now, before the breathers spot the smoke and seek out its origin. When that happens, it’s doubtful our family will be able to remain…hidden.
2 (10 3/4 ounce) cans cheddar cheese soup
Morning looked somewhat better on the sickness front -- the children were limp, but at least there was no more vomit -- so we walked into old town Ceský Krumlov. It didn't disappoint. It's tiny and old and twisty-streeted and brightly colored. It's a very special place and we loved it completely.
Full details about the internship programme and how to apply for a bursary will be published in May. Think you might be interested? Then please register your interest today.
We had a small little party for her.
The sexes deceive themselves about each other—because at bottom they honor and love only themselves (or their own ideals, to put it more pleasantly). Thus man likes woman peaceful—but woman is essentially unpeaceful, like a cat, however well she may have trained herself to seem peaceable.[12]
The next few months have frequently been described as a period of "dual power." In Barcelona, industry and commerce were largely collectivized, and a wave of collectivization spread through rural areas, as well as towns and villages, in Aragon, Castile, and the Levante, and to a lesser but still significant extent in many parts of Catalonia, Asturias, Es
‘Hello’, she says, ‘I’m Libriumia’
Now stowing tools of complacency
she looked like she was hiding something.
And when he had said these things, as they were looking on, he was lifted up, and a cloud took him out of their sight. And while they were gazing into heaven as he went, behold, two men stood by them in white robes, and said, “Men of Galilee, why do you stand looking into heaven? This Jesus, who was taken up from you into heaven, will come in the same way as you saw him go into heaven.” Acts 1:9-11
1 tbsp olive oil
My time-bound children, I tell you this:
We hope you will consider joining us next year at beautiful Kenyon College in Gambier, Ohio for the 2012 MidWest Oboe Camp. If you’re closer to Georgia, also check out the 2012 Oxford Oboe Camp (a different branch of the same camp), located in Marietta, Georgia.
Or something to that effect. More like Chipper was accused of stealing signs by Moyer. Well, I hate to break it to the old(er) man, but that’s part of the game. It’s not like he was in center field with binoculars, picking off the catcher’s signals. This is something everyone tries to do, and rarely succeeds at. When the runner IS successful, it’s often the catcher’s fault.Winner: Chipper
Darkness on the hallways. Voices echo. Silence
Me: Oh no! What happened?
If I can do it, you can do it. Just ask God to lead the way.
In the meantime however, a perfectly placed dried date stuffed with peanut butter and rolled in confectionery sugar delicately placed in each “egg spot” will serve us well and still allow me to justify keeping this dish.
As the earth starts to warm the earthworm casts appear, inviting the return of the robins. Some tribes called this Moon the Full Crow Moon, because the cawing of crows signaled the end of winter. It was also known as the Seed Moon as it was now time for sowing.
3. Israel, Iran And Reason, examines the reaction to the AWL's arguments for supporting a pre-emptive Israeli attack on Iran.
The camera’s were flashing, anticipation in the air, awaiting the Spring 2012 looks to be revealed at the Grammys. I was in shock to see a sea of black make its way down the carpet. Embellished with gold accessories, stars managed to make this cliché look fresh and modern.
I need to be honest with you … I’ve been working on a subject for this blog for a couple of weeks, but the topic refuses to cooperate. This is how it’s gone over and over: I think the ideas are coming together just right. I’m feelin’ the flow … feelin’ the love …
Please check for the buyer reviews and ratings of Dell Studio XPS 9100 Desktop- Intel® CoreTMi7-930 (2.80GHz), Genuine Windows® 7 Home Premium, 64bit, 8 gb ddr3, 2 TB HD , NVIDIA GeForce G310 512MB, Single Drive: 16X CD/DVD burner (DVD+/-RW) w/double layer write capability,10/100/1000 (Gigabit) Ethernet , wireless from the merchant’s website by click on the link below.
Today, I had a child off ill from school and I am likely to have her off for the rest of the week due to the school’s strictness in applying public health guidelines. My child is ill because someone else ignored the selfsame guidelines and sent their child to school, lying to the school staff in the process as work obviously took priority for them over other children’s welfare. I will abide by the guidelines even though it means that it will disrupt my routine over the next few day. I do not feel it is fair to my child to send her back when she may still be feeling under the weather or to the other children in her class.
Last night the Mamavation Moms were chosen. My name was not called. I was not surprised. In fact, I felt relieved. As great as it might have been to have my life planned out for the next 7 week, I’ve been doing pretty darn good on my own. I like being in control of what I put into my body. I like being in control of how I move my body. I LIKE BEING IN CONTROL OF ME!
It seems the main sticking point for the Lib Dems is the extent to which the market will play a role in the provisioning of a free-at-the-point-of-use service.
N - Netherlands, Netherlands Antilles, New Caledonia, New Zealand, Norway
Still, it is the more politically-charged songs that stand out lyrically. “Juveniles Detained at Guantanamo Bay” anchors the end portion of the tape in this respect, though after moving out of what felt like a rather slow middle section, is complemented by some excellent lighter tracks like “Yo What’s Good New York” and a refrain of “Womyn”. Nehru Jackets is over an hour long and though it offers up a surprising amount of content, it feels long as a whole and definitely strays into filler territory once in a while. Overall, though, the tracks are stronger and better thought-out than the Das Racist LP from last year and Heems shows an encouraging progression toward a better-rounded sound that will, hopefully, find its way into future releases from the group.
1013 **D-III/10/1988. “Forms May Matter: A Command Performance on the Anastaplo Bar Admission Case.” Claremont-McKenna College, Claremont, California. (Incorporated in Item C-1990(5), above, pp. 2065-84.)
What a little Tooper!! It gets more and more fun...
All kettle bell swings went unbroken, but not unobserved or un-coached. Jack caught me coasting (as much as anyone swinging a 52 pound iron ball in front of themselves repeatedly can coast). My body was loose and the swings were soft all the way through. I was allowing momentum at the top of the swing, to dictate the range of motion and just letting it drop rather than driving the kettle bell down again. Jack caught me and coached me to tighten up and actively stop the top of the swing and violently drive the kettle bell back down. Whew! That’s a whole lot more work!
Fish buried: 1 (poor Theo, he has been lounging around in Crazy Redhead and Sunglasses' freezer for over a month now.)
Prepare the rapini by washing it well and then cutting the bottom 1/2″ from the stems, often very tough and woody. Roughly chop the rapini into 3-4″ lengths and blanch it in boiling water for about 4 mins.; drain and set aside. In a skillet over medium-high heat, combine the olive oil and anchovies; if using fillets, use the back of a spoon to mash them into the oil and create a paste. They should “melt” fairly easily; don’t be concerned about small pieces left whole. Add the garlic to the anchovy oil and cook for a minute or two before adding the tomatoes and red wine, if using; stir in the blanched rapini. Lower the heat to medium and cover; allow the sauce to simmer for at least 15 mins. and up to half an hour. If you plan to cook the sauce longer, consider adding the rapini after 10-15 mins. of cooking so it does not turn to mush.
SANTORUM: Well, the possible solution is — I actually agree with Governor Romney. The bottom line is that we need to enforce the laws in this country.
They have impeccable manners, avoid bad words and know how to share, and have never once needed to be reminded not to poke a knife in the power point or run onto the road without looking.
Do not miss this: when Shirley Sherrod's video clip was first released to the mainstream press, the NAACP denounced her; the USDA, with complicity of the White House, fired her; the white farm family against whom she had supposedly discriminated jumped to her immediate and vigorous defense. These white farmers were the first to speak on her behalf. While others were saying she should be ashamed of herself, they loudly declared her an ally and a friend for life. The defense of Mrs. Sherrod came most effectively and fully from the white farming community. She had been their ally for years. They did not hesitate to return the favor. The roller coaster of this story and the sentiments it has stirred provoked my own sense of the rut that race relations and popular racial discourse have become trapped within.
3/29/2012 Grand Rapids, MI – Billy’s Lounge
3. You won't end up on the waiting list because Blogalicious 2010 WILL.sell.out. We've doubled attendance this year but passes are going fast.
The period that Jacob spent east of the Sierra Nevada Mountains allowed him to wallow in loneliness and grief over the separation from his family. But he remained determined to find them. And it took him another four to five years before he finally did. Becoming a member of John Charles Frémont’s California Volunteer Militia during the Mexican-American War allowed Jacob to scour the region for signs or news of his remaining family. Five years passed before he finally came upon the ranch that Jethro and Thunder Heart Woman had settled. Jacob also discovered that in the intervening years, his brother and wife had considered him dead, began a relationship and had a child – a little girl named Cornflower. Devastated by this turn of events, Jacob decided not to reveal himself to his family. At least not openly. Instead, he left the wooden medicine wheel necklace that Thunder Heart Woman had given him when they first met to his youngest child, Jacob High Cloud. Another five years passed before Jacob finally reconciled with his family, due to the efforts of his daughter, Margaret Light Shines.
I needed someone to understand my ups and downs
Anyway, enjoy your day! Thanks for stopping by!
The Wide Horizon is my favorite, favorite, favorite book in Loula Grace Erdman's Texas Panhandle trilogy. (It might have something to do with the fact that I read it a dozen times as a child. I never got a chance to read the first or last book in this series.)
Bake 20 to 25 minutes or until toothpick inserted in centers comes out clean. Cool 5 minutes; remove from pan to wire racks. Cool completely.
Ghostbusters, which may as well be titled Whitebusters, is, apart from its white-washing which we'll discuss below, a near-perfect film. Deeply ingrained into our 1980s childhood, some lines - such as, There is no PPCC, there is only Zool! - are eminently quotable and appropriate for all occasions. Or, even better, Choose the form of the destructor!
And look, more jars waiting to be filled with more stuff. Perhaps if my darling sister, GoddessK, returns Mom's dehydrator I can fill these two with apple rings or dried mushrooms or strips of yummy sugar melon. (I wonder if she'll read this - love ya girl!)
He walks with a barren heart, he knows not of love
as i 'right-side-outed' another shirt, i heard my song, and realized there was a day when 'right-side-outing' and folding laundry did not sound melodious.
I would like to take what I know, my experiences working in IT, somehow translate them into the science fictional world. Rotate them around fictional axes until they slot into the thrilling space saga I’m still looking at. I may have to actually put it aside for a bit because the ending doesn’t make sense to me again. This isn’t actually a mystery story but it does ask dramatically, “Who killed Nikki and why?”. That answer at least makes sense. (The captain, in the cargo bay, with the satellite. To preserve a mission secret). That part’s still solid–even though the meaning of a murder is different if senior management has to kill the crew after every planetary survey.
(yes, the picture is blurry, but it was the best I got... And I need to loose weight....)
so i have returned home from an easy day of college with a spring in my step and have dragged a recliner out into my 4 metre square of a city garden, stripped down to a lame american apparel bikini top and some old shorts and withstack of magazines and lee scratch perry blaring from the stereo inside the house, am fully understanding the word "bliss".
It is great to use a big dollop on jacked potatoes.
This is Womens History Month. A Catholic friend sent this to me. As a practicing Lutheran, I salute these sisters for taking a stand. That is what makes people’s history–the real stuff.
Like em'?????? Well, you can make them too...
Classic Daiquiri
It has been a busy busy week but a good one. I've been learning tons and was even able to see the nutritionist that my Dr referred me too. She is actually the co author of a book call the Insulin-Resistance-Diet.
1 fate
So that is my delightful distraction whilst I format for e-publishing. I am going to give the traditional route another shot.
Published: 28/04/2012 at 04:58 PM Online news: World 6
~Hans Christian Andersen
"Does that mean I am wasting my time here?"
Do you know how hard that is?
(The rationale behind the member voting is suggested by a New York Times article on the contest, which quotes Mark Gompertz, executive vice president and publisher of Touchstone Fireside: "[The manuscript] will have a seal of approval by the time it gets to the fourth round...There’s something intriguing about a community of readers out there preselecting it by voting for it. You know that many more eyes have read the thing than if it had been seen by a single agent.” In other words, the winning novel will come with a built-in fan base. Hmmm, isn't that similar to the rationale employed by some manuscript display sites that purport to use member ratings as an incentive to get agents and editors to look at the "best" entries? There are a hundred things you can say about this--a few hundred voters does not an audience make, voting for chapters doesn't necessarily translate into buying books, there'll be at least 6-8 months between the end of the contest and publication for the voters to forget about the whole thing...In other words, good luck with that.)
Artist Alex Maleev
Later still on the lazy train, I didn't want to spend a lot of time cooking for dinner but wanted something healthy...so I decided to use one of the beautiful avocados I had on the counter to make a simple avocado pasta. The avocado sauce has a nice creamy texture that tastes rich and the basil and lemon give it a nice zesty zing. If you want to make it gluten-free like I did, you can use quinoa pasta. Also, if you want to jazz it up a bit you could sprinkle some Parmesan cheese, halved grape tomatoes or sliced almonds on it.
It followed you at every angle. Creeptastic.
Here are a few highlights (all mileage estimates are from the Yanceyville Road trailhead):
And be sure to include all of Y-O-U!
All 007 movies would be G,
I’d consulted with a feng shui gardener and she gave me the 9 sections of my yard, the various plant materials and colours for each sector and I used her guidelines in conjunction with my landscaper. He went through all the suggestions, came up with a great plan also keeping low maintenance in mind and it all came together late Nov. 2002. So Spring 2003 was my first year to really enjoy the new blooming of everything and I couldn’t wait to enjoy it.
James followed despondently. The panic that he had felt before was gone, replaced by despondency and a vague sense of betrayal. James glanced at Emily, who had a steely look on her face and radiated determination. Suddenly that look was replaced by confusion, then excitement.
8. Satan is still a defeated enemy.
2011 was a pretty awesome year for us. Lots of changes. I can't believe when I look back at the pics from January of last year, that it was only a year ago. Cailin was a baby just turning one. Cory got a new job and moved out to CA without us, leaving us to pack while he found a house. We moved to CA (a place I never thought I'd live). My big girls turned 3 and 5. Cory turned 30. We went to a couple of really great weddings. The girls got some pretty serious haircuts. Breanne started kindergarten. Janey started preschool. Janey then got shingles. I had a super awesome birthday that I somehow didn't blog about. We made some really cute costumes for Halloween, We had our very own thanksgiving for the first time ever. And Christmas was awesome. :) Really, minus a couple minor things, it really was a great year. I'm so glad all this went so, so well, when there seemed like so much potential for craziness.
I have a huge head so I know to sit low. People with big heads that haven’t figured this out yet should be in prison. If it’s the hair that’s making the head in front of you so big, just trim some of it off with a pair of scissors. It’s dark, and they won’t notice what you've done to them until they get home. By that time, you’re already half-way to Mexico.
Looking at the human body there are three important spots. The brain, the heart and the eyes. I know, I know, I know but that will have to wait for part 6 or 7 of AA&AA. What is coming up here is already hard enough to swallow.
Some Labour Councils are enthusiastically pursuing the goal of becoming a "Co-operative Council" even as they continue to define what they mean (and struggle to communicate this to senior officers). Others are sat on the sidelines watching.
I WILL SAY THOUGH: If you plan on making these, I'd highly recommend melting the chips in a double boiler, or if you don't have one, placing a glass bowl over a saucepan of simmering water more than does the trick. If you try the microwave like the recipe suggests, you may end up with some scorched chips, and who wants that?
"Empire has tapped into something vital, dangerous, and all-too-absent from so much rock music today ... this isn't the death of rock `n' roll but a blasting, needle-in-the-red affirmation of its power. Turn it up." - KERRANG
Lectin
What made things worse and more complicated was that rich people channelled these loans through their ownership and control of banks and big business, and this was done on a global scale.
The Pirate Dinner Adventure is an interactive show geared towards playful kids and adults who wanted to be pirates once — located in 2 opposite areas of the U.S., Buena Park, California and Orlando, Florida. It’s an adventure that has potential but lacks the “Argh” that is expected from anything pirate related.
The Great Depression has left most people ruined. However, one of the most thriving market businesses is fuelled by the Prohibition that has led to crime families making a fortune selling bootlegged liquor. However, the social experiment since the end of WWI has been repealed by 1933. The crime families will compete for control of other illegal activities as their government sponsored great profit maker comes to an end.
3. Taking Care of Myself
Braves: Mike Stanton; Reds: Juan Samuel; Rockies: Alex Cole; Astros: Casey Candaele; Dodgers: Carlos Hernandez; Padres: Jose Melendez; Giants: Cory Snyder
GARROSH: Um…okay. So listen, dude, whatever you do, don’t go into one of your animal forms around this chick, you know?
But by 1969 the glory days of the Driskill seemed to be over. LBJ retired to his ranch, depressed that the Vietnam War might obscure the other accomplishments of his career. The hotel that had been his headquarters was very run-down and there was talk of tearing it down and putting up a parking garage on the site.
but did not know how to tell which ones were the
and continue finishing the 3 trebles(dc) as normal...
“Intelligence” is the operative word. Kaminsky tells his story with engaging, thoughtful prose–no gimmicky diets, no impossible-to-follow menu plans. He believes in gratification, not denial. “For a change in diet to succeed, it must be at least as satisfying as the unheathful fast food and processed ingredients that it replaces,” he writes. In fact, one of the reasons he decided to lose weight was so that he could look forward to many more years of drinking great wines and eating juicy steaks….”
Some were killed because they went to work or to the shops in the face of a stayaway call. Some died on commuter trains and taxis. Some were slain as they lay sleeping in their beds, or waiting at bus stops, or driving in cars. Some died in massacres.
'If you think you're being followed, obviously try and get away. But if you can't, I'd advise doing something odd. Attackers don't want to deal with the unpredictable. I know one young woman who was sure she was being followed, when she picked up the lid of a steel dustbin and started talking to it. She then climbed into the dustbin. The attacker ran away.'
Nec pro materia fertur doluisse suique
All the autonomous regions experienced a drop in sales figures, with the best results seen in Andalusia with 17,170 sales, followed by Madrid with 12,241. Valencia and Catalonia followed with 11,743 and 11,220, respectively.
Phyllis is still traveling - I hope you've all had a chance to keep up! There should be posts from North Carolina and Italy, and maybe another from St, Lucia coming up soon!
The design is fresh and slightly at odds to the Ryanair brand, bright vibrant colours, simple slab typography and a sense of space runs through the magazine, but perhaps intentionally, acting as a sanctuary to escape to from the lack of space onboard. The use of the camera phone bar codes are a nifty new touch, allowing the reader to continue their read on their smart phone when they leave the plane.
The hero in “Les Mis” is a good man hounded by a mad policeman for the crime of stealing a loaf of bread to feed his starving family.
In fact, I’m SO happy with the result, that I’m going to end the post riiiiight now.
love confuses everyone
I believe a series of ground based stations , using a HAARP type technology (i.e. a ground based station that emits a HF frequency to induce an effect in the atmosphere or higher)…. possibly even a tweaking of the current RADAR system itself .. is being used to emit VHF or EHF .. could conversely POSSIBLY produce VLF (very low frequency) or relay very low frequency on using the tiltable AIM method..
The orchid, located along the southern rim of the Mediterranean (bottom picture), has evolved to look like a bee. Now, orchid flowers generally take on unique shapes that often pair with other animals, but this one stands out. In this case, bees confuse the petal for a female bee, attracting the male to mate. While the bee is struggling to mate, the motion allows the orchid to drop pollen all over the bee's body, sending the bee away with a little present for the next orchid it is tricked into mating with.
Nope. I got this for a fantastic ending price. I've said it before....Dominion is the single most volatile product from a price standpoint that I've ever seen. When cards /5 go for less than cards /50. When cards /5 are way less than half of what other Lindens /5 are in other products. Crazy stuff.
The Star Whale looked pretty cool.
7. The Other Shoe
When on the hunt for good squeeze page templates here are some of the basic components a good squeeze page should have:
As for Part Deux of the renovation, Mr. Rock-My-Socks-Off Contractor enclosed the pass-thru from our Living Room to Den. Yeah, in that same three day period he was working on the bathroom! Too shallow to call this life changing?
20 generations
I am SaLuSa from Sirius, and enjoying the thought of being part of your Ascension, and I am as interested as any visitor to your Solar System. They are allowed entry and near the Earth, but we place a limit upon how near they may come. The area around Earth is patrolled by our craft, and absolutely no interference with you is allowed. You are indeed safe with us as your mentors.
You'll have to come by to check out those prizes.
Is a message for all religions,
07/03 - Toronto, ON Molson Amphitheatre
3/4 cup shredded,chopped kale (cut out the spine)
If you cross the South African Border illegally you get:
Pants: Onyx Wear – “MiSH” Mesh Jeans – Aqua (Culture Shock 2012 Exclusive!)
1 pull
Huge swathes of England are Tory blue, with the odd tiny bit of red dotted about the place. And then when you get to the poorer areas of the UK you start to see big clumps of Labour red. And this tends to give people in these regions a belief that they are somehow more valuable to Labour than anywhere else. After all, when an area of Wales that is around three times larger than London is coloured red then surely we must matter more to Labour than them?
I felt sick to my stomach. I had stopped my best friend from being with the love of her life, and now she could never be with him with this huge impotent shadow that was me cast over their relationship. I told him to stop talking for the last time. Respect me, I said. I had heard enough. There were so many questions running through my head but it did not matter because what done was done. There was no rewind button, and no Ctrl-Z that you could use to undo everything. The rain had reduced to a fuzzy drizzle, making everything outside almost foggy. It was time for him to go.
Mission: RAK
205 1. “We the People: The Rulers and the Ruled.” The Great Ideas Today, vol. 1987, pp. 52-72 (Encyclopedia Britannica, 1987).
A medley of cereals (love cereal) with almond milk
Kaleidoscope
An American Christmas is a delightful collection of Americana that was originally a radio show and first aired in 1984. It was created on 33 rpm LP records to be used by the radio station. This set consisted of 12 LP records and would have aired over 12 or more hours. The last track of the series, containing the signoff and credits, was aired only once during the Christmas season and that was at 2:40 pm on Christmas day, according to a large hand-written note attached to the record set I own.
Use the active voice instead of passive voice. It is recommended – Pediatricians recommend
A dark man went on shovelling outside the door and all of a sudden I started to cry and I screamed: “I’ll bite him! I’ll go outside and bite him!”
For as long as I can remember I have had a passion for acting. When I was little I would put on performances with my friends for my family. Sometimes it was a play; sometimes a magic show, a circus, or we would even construct a haunted house for them to go through. They always patiently complied. I took ballet and Spanish dance. When I entered grade school it turned into theater. I loved being on stage, being able to pretend a different life was mine, one where anything was possible. The thought of one day being a famous actress consumed me. I would be able to travel. I would see the world and at the same time I would be able to be whoever I wanted. I could try on different characters, be dressed and dolled. I want to be a star.
Gorelick's 1999 single, “What A Wonderful World” stirred controversy among the jazz community regarding the overdubbing of Louis Armstrong's classic recording. A common criticism was that such a revered recording by a musician known especially for improvisation should not be altered. Pat Metheny responded to this recording by saying, "With this single move, Kenny G became one of the few people on earth I can say that I really can't use at all - as a man, for his incredible arrogance to even consider such a thing, and as a musician, for presuming to share the stage with the single most important figure in our music."
JONNY walks to the edge of the building, arms folded across his chest.
from his prized imitation Batman utility belt and scans the sky.
Martha!!(Is that not funny?? Martha wins a Martha punch:))
All that was mine in Silvia I give thee.
Packaging is one of the most difficult stages of moving. It is skillful task and just an expert, trained and experienced person can handle Cheap guild wars 2 gold the task. You need to pack every single item associated with house. But do not obtain afraid you’ll accomplish the task easily. You can study the actual packing tricks to load up household items. Here are some tips to bring along goods for moving effortlessly:
This is what a child who is part monkey looks like. :-)
We will be finding out our platform and where we will go
Let's face it - by the time I wake up, drag my ass to the gym, work and get home through rush hour traffic, I've been in constant motion for thirteen hours!! Who is going to make a frikkin pot roast by that time?! I guess a girl can dream...
slower versions which I made with the help of my Technics turntable.
Both Sushi-cyu and Patio are in the All Seasons Place. All Seasons Place is an office building with some shopping mall on the lower levels and is located right next to Conrad Hotel, where we stayed for the first 4 nights. My Japanese friend recommended Sush-cyu for Japanese food. It was simply very convenient. I thought that the Japanese food at Sushi-cyu was quite authentic. However, it was quite expensive for our wallet probably because of the location being in the heart of business district. I imagine this place being more for business people to have business dinner.
Here is what the wreath looks like (photo via pinterest.com)
Hong Kong – 12 in Hong King Island Urban Area, was 15 for commercial but reduced to 12 in 2008 over concerns that the island was becoming overdeveloped [11].
I know I have a really hard time trying to paint them..
Meanwhile, heat 1 tbsp oil in a non-stick pan and fry onions till they get light brown. Let them cool down and then blend it fine like chutney. Please do not blend while its still hot, this may be dangerous. Allow it to cool till room temperature first.
Sometimes I think I have to do something grand in order for it to be worthwhile or noticed. Sometimes I feel overwhelmed because I don't know where I will get the time, the means, or the idea for "what" I should do. Sometimes I wonder if the little things done daily really matter or if every day should be something fabulous. And then I ruminate about the idea that maybe the little things are the grand things.
"Actually Stephanie, it's too sweet for me."
This conundrum is partly ans­wered by the euphoric piece our former president Thabo Mbeki wrote for Bloomberg news: "We were convinced that, were we to win the right to host the soccer World Cup, this would make a decisive contribution to the achievement of the goal of vital importance to all Africans, of destroying the demeaning stereotype of a hopeless continent."
Amanda's Parties to Go created one of my favorite gift ideas, which we also made last year. Who doesn't love chocolate covered Oreos? And especially when they are displayed in a cute little pencil vase! She even offers free printables to help you complete the look.
It was so hot that I ended up having to borrow a gorgeous fan in order to cool myself down. Sitting there fanning myself I felt so feminine, even a bit old fashioned.
However, their leaves? Alas,
Years..(oh it can’t be)
-he’s all about platitudes with no detail,
* February is the shortest month of the year, but since Doug posts approximately every 17 minutes, he makes up for it.
Marvel at the neon lights, dancing water soaring 240 feet high, laser beam visible from space, erupting volcanoes, and the throng of people coming up, down and over the Strip.
I would LOVE to know what you think
The ever serenading singer Bruno Mars had a tremendous success in such a small span of time. This American singer-songwriter and producer had vocalized top songs like ‘Just The Way you Are’, ‘Nothin’ On You’ and ‘The Lazy Song’ just to name a few. But in partnership to a singer’s success is, of course, fashion; and this man, this amazing man made it to the cut to be the very first person to be featured on On The Spotlight.
Me: "Just going with the flow, I thought you were into it."
Place chocolate and heavy cream in a microwave bowl, melt on high for about 45 seconds. Whisk until smooth, and transfer to the refrigerator to cool completely, 20-30 minutes.
It's about time!
4. Mix the dressing, tehina and spaghetti together.
'I thought it would be pleasant to spend some time with you,' I responded.
the tilers are due to come in 9 days time. that still makes me rather nervous- does this look like it will be ready for tiling by then to you?
Add 1/8 teaspoon Nutmeg.
Design Patents, Trade Dress, EU Community Design Utility models – Compare & Contrast by Perry Saidman – Saidman Design Law Group, Silver Spring, Maryland
Today I shall begin with a survey in this week's French Elle which asked Frenchmen what they like -- and more important perhaps -- what they don't like us to wear.
With the help of my light box, I managed to get the basic shape from yesterdays doodle. The fabric is thick and medium heavy--like lighter denim. I'm planning a wristlet from it...and maybe it'll go into my etsy shop? That's my next big endeavor. I'm a bit nervous about the whole process, so for the next little while I'll just concentrate on having fun creating...and finishing the next round of teacher bags! Six elementary teachers are on my list this year--what will I do when all four of my kids are in school??
The last thread of hope
L: How am I supposed to ask him if he is a figment of my imagination?
STUDIO: Lionsgate
Good Morning Everyone!!
I didn't think I was going to post anything today: I didn't know anyone who died on that day 10 years ago, I was not in harm's way (though I feared such) living just outside of Atlanta. What right do I have to write about September 11th?
Fortunately, I knew a big grey dude that could really benefit from some time under a much more talented equestrian's behind. I'm going to be out of town this weekend, memorial day weekend, and potentially the weekend after that. Add a few evening meetings for work in each week, and mid May to mid June were looking pretty sparse as far as Granite rides go. The timing was perfect and amazingly, Jen was really pumped about the proposition of taking my grey horse for a month!
SHUUJI: That’s something you have to figure out for yourself!
(Excerpt from You Can Go Home – Deconstructing the Demons, copyright 2012 Sharon Crawford)
When: May 13, 2010, 10:00 am and 12:00 pm seatings
5. FAQ refers to “frequently asked questions” in internet lingo.
Nearly eight in ten feline owners agree that obesity in our cats is a growing problem, so let's make a stand and make sure that our companions are kept trim and, most importantly, happy !
When we returned home from the hospital after that diagnosis I retreated to my favorite prayer spot and entered the presence of my heavenly Father. There was such peace there. I presented my questions to my Lord: “How? Why? What now?”. He gave me several words – which have sustained me for these three years: 1. “This experience is not just for you – I will use it in others’ lives.” 2. “Don’t be afraid.” 3. “Wait on me.” 4. “Trust me.”
Maybe it really is the Fed. At the rate they're spending money, they've got to get something to back it with. Maybe it really is Zimbabwe Ben...
I can trust a God like this! No matter what.
A million books to read
Over time, a few of my American coworkers would pick up the tagline “mojoey” whenever we were in the cafeteria. Mojoey quickly replaced the less popular “Grow Jo” and a new nickname was born. I let it die when I came home in 2000, but picked it up again while at Grad School. My initial blogging experiences while using my real name were bad. I got lots of hate mail and a few death threats, so I. switched to Mojoey early on. It kind of fits too.
Can't wait to see what is your favorite technique!
And how is your Monday going?
3.) Are you capable of forgiving and forgetting?
It is plain clear that whichever coalition wins the next general election the Malays are well-represented in Malaysian politics. “So why should the Malays worry if Umno fails to make it in the next general election?” asked a young Malay executive who was at the scene of the rally.
QVC will be hawking merchandise as Clogau Gold (the official gold of the Royal Family), smashbox, Isaac Mizrahi, Kenneth Jay Lane, Darlington Crystal and more, the Royal Affair broadcasts will be accompanied by exclusive online content on QVC.com, including tips from wedding experts and additional “royal” products.
The first postcard, my favourite of the three, shows a group of female workers in an industrial setting. Their uniforms are very clean which makes me think that they may be laundry workers, but that is pure conjecture on my part. I love the beaming smile on the girl second left.
I guess that technology increasingly removes this divide, but short of fully immersive video environments, typically the online world is includes more text and discussion, less audio and video. There is an inbuilt moderation and self reflection in this type of discussion.
Paul could see I had gone dizzy and hurried to sit me down before I fell down.
Joey steps over. Holds tight onto my leg. Buries his head into my trousers. Looks up. I rub his hair. Feel nine foot tall.
In addition to the bottle cap design change, consumers will initially see stickers on six, twelve and twenty-pack cartons of all Boulevard heritage brands, informing them to use a bottle opener. Prior to this change, only Boulevard Pilsner and the brewery’s Smokestack Series 12-ounce beers were sealed with a pry-off crown. Now, the only bottles not capped with this type of top are the 750mL bottles in the Smokestack Series, which continue to be corked and caged.
Did he have any idea what it was like to awaken in someone else’s dreams? She’d been waking in his since the day he walked away. The day she’d stood, a wind tugging at her dress, watching him grow smaller. He never looked back.
I will be going through my posts and sidebar shortly (if I haven't already by the time this post publishes) to redirect all links to the new blog.
Chille powder – ¼ teaspoon
Whether gathered around a table in a Sunday school room or at the house of a fellow mom, we’d let our children play for hours and talk.
It has been way too long since I last posted anything on this blog. I have to say that the last few months have absolutely flown by. Since my last post I finished up (and passed) my surgical clerkship as well as finished a month long rotation through family medicine and am currently in the middle of a month long neurology clerkship. I honestly can’t believe how quickly time has been moving over the past several months. It often seems like the year is moving by ever quicker. Perhaps it is due to the fact that I am now having to focus on my schedule for fourth year and decide which electives I want to do as well as apply for any possible away rotations that might be useful. Perhaps it is secondary to having completed the vast majority of the clerkships and that I can now see a light at the end of the third year tunnel (that no longer appears to be a freight train). Or perhaps it is because I feel like I have reacquainted myself with the joy that I originally found in medicine in the first place and have discovered a group of practitioners who are many times more passionate about the medicine they practice than any that I have worked with all year.
Gas Chambers
I know that Vittles and Bits is a place where most of you come to get recipes, but some of you come to get stories, too. And today I want to share with you a story very close to my heart. (And also a giveaway! So even if you hate stories-just read on, k?)
So I did the next best thing, we talked about it. I told him sometimes grown ups don’t get along, they decide to go their separate ways, but they always love their children. That never goes away. And it is never the children’s fault that parents divorce. The grown ups sometimes feel they need to live separately to be happy. But his daddy and I get along just fine and we will not get divorced.
fitted with the whisk attachment, whip the cream to medium peaks. Gently fold the cream into the chilled lemon curd. Scrape the mousse into the cooled crust, smoothing the top. Refrigerate the tart for at least 4 hours before serving.
Than climb the cross of the moment
Focus of the themed issue:
I subscribe to several digital magazines through the Kindle store. Right now I’m getting a month of The New Yorker for $2.99, but that’s suppose to go up to $5.99 soon. (What is it about stuff from New York being more expensive?) Most of the magazines I get from Amazon are $1.99 a month, way under the cost for a printed copy at the newsstand. The Rolling Stone is $2.99 and I usually get two issues in a month. So for $15 a month, the price of The New York Times, I get 11 magazines (4 New Yorkers, 2 Rolling Stones, Discover, Maximum PC, National Geographic, Home Theater and The Magazine of Fantasy and Science Fiction). That’s a lot of reading for $15 a month, and a lot of variety.
i spread my legs like most wives
At about 3:30 another pipe burst, and was spraying water out of an electrical outlet outside the main front entrance. The alarm was going again and the firetruck returned.
… I was so excited to go home to play with my baby nephew who visited our house… but they already went home, but it’s still a holiday tomorrow!…
While there's considerable variation in strength, there's one thing all the beers have in common: a high degree of attenuation. Only three are below 80% apparent attenuation. Four are over 90%. All must have been pretty dry.
The Overture was another case in point, its opening gravely Beethovenian. Despite the difference in tempo and almost everything else, I was somehow put in mind of Coriolan. An unfortunate split horn note was heard upon the horns entry, but thereafter, throughout the work, the LSO’s horns were on excellent form, just as required in this of all operas. There was a sense of fairy-tale: I thought of Davis’s Hänsel und Gretel for the Royal Opera. But there was also, and increasingly so, Wagnerian gravity to be heard, reminding us that, so many times in this work, Siegfried is but a stone’s throw away. Fafner’s lair takes form in the Wolf’s Glen Scene. And there was no shortage of dramatic drive to the conclusion of the Overture, but Davis and his wonderful orchestra saw no reason to resort to anything hinting at superficial display. Orchestral malevolence was to be heard in spades at the opening of Kaspar’s aria, ‘Schweig! damit dich niemand warnt,’ and a proper storm was cooked up in that celebrated finale to the second act. (Electronic sound effects proved slightly alienating, but what does one do in a concert performance?) If not exactly folksy – and does one really want that? – there was certainly a nice orchestral jauntiness to Ännchen’s ‘Kommt ein schlanker Bursch gegangen’. Whilst a list of notable orchestral solos would doubtless extend to almost every section principal, I feel I cannot fail to mention the superlative contributions of leader, Carmine Lauri, Rebecca Gilliver (cello), Gareth Davies (flute), and of course, the viola obbligato in ‘Einst träumte meiner sel’gen Base’ (it looked like Paul Silverthorne to me, although the programme said otherwise, so I should probably credit Edward Vanderspare too, just in case).
I’ve lived farther away for longer periods of time but I was younger with more money and fewer children and making trips back to what I’ll always consider my home was no big deal. If I was desperate for the reel screaming pull of a big redfish (which in my heart of hearts will always be a spottail bass), the smell of pluff mud or the taste of shrimp that were caught within hours of when they were eaten, I could make plans and be where I wanted within a week or two. I would often make the fourteen hour drive from Brooklyn to Charleston just to spend a long weekend. Didn’t even think that much about it.
Now they have decided the best option is to get rid of the others in the hope that private sector cash can be secured to regenerate the sites.
PARCEL TAPE and cobbled-together ideas of make-do animation studios have, in the past few days and weeks, been sensibly hurled into the Rubbish Bin Of Silly Plans and replaced with a quite state-of-the-art-yet-cosy set-up under our eaves, complete with all sorts of bells and whistles and contraptions to make animating easier.
P.S. Be ready for the debut of my new blog once I get back from the Honeymoon! I will be transitioning you all into my new blogging home as I start my recaps!
Abram Games suggests that meanings are made through our cognitive creation and interpretation of the signs.
We all have bad days, and we all get through them. What helps you feel better and make it through the rough ones?
Before serving, run an immersion blender through it just to make sure it's completely smooth. Thin with a little milk if necessary.
mugs, tea bowls, berry mugs, mini vases, and a few other items)
9 SAME-SEX relationships are illegal in more than 70 countries. In nine - including Afghanistan, Iran and Saudi Arabia - the penalty is death.
This year I’ve become a Ciclavia evangelist. I’ve offered all my students extra-credit for coming (and writing about the experience); my family is driving up from OC for the day. I firmly believe in the power of experiencing ownership for the first time. One can’t forget the feeling that these streets belong to people, not to cars.
Now that the act has overwhelmingly made it through the House, the next set of hands to sift through its pages could very well be President Barack Obama; the US Senate had already passed the bill back on February 6. Less than two months ago, the president approved the National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2012, essentially suspending habeas corpus from American citizens. Could the next order out of the Executive Branch be revoking some of the Bill of Rights? Only if you consider the part about being able to assemble a staple of the First Amendment, really. Don’t worry, though. Obama was, after all, a constitutional law professor. When he signed the NDAA on December 31, he accompanied his signature with a signing statement that let Americans know that, just because he authorized the indefinite detention of Americans didn’t mean he thought it was right.
Many employers will not provide legal representation if the matter involves licensing or disciplinary action against the nurse. This could force the nurse to fund all the fees and costs associated with her defense. However, some larger corporations with good risk management programs will provide the nurse with legal representation for such matters.
Here's the thing with self-doubt: it lies. It does. Because of course, not everyone is going to like what I write. I don't know about your first drafts, but mine are never going to be publishable--it's going to take a ton of editing and rewriting and critique partners and beta readers ripping it to shreds and helping me find the weak points.
Onto the streets, I found the Bus Stop location to await the bus returning home. It lay off of a grassy lot where no homes were located. I felt alone, and anxious. I stood as nearest to the paved curb as possible without standing in the street. This way, if something happened, I could flag a car for help, or run across to where the school was located. My peace was soon interrupted by loud calls from the window of cars passing by, and I realized I was being called by racial slurs. I stood and prayed for my bus to come. Around about the time when school lets out, I could hear from the distance the sounds and yells of students walking home. As they neared me, I moved towards the curb, silent and looking ahead. Everything was going well. Then, from the distance, the sound of boys, some on bikes yelling “Hey, it’s a nigger!” I tensed, but stood still with rising fears abounding. As they got closer, their taunting and name-calling escalated, and in fear I stepped off the curb into the street. A few stopped when they arrived to where I was, as others walked past me laughing, more witnesses than perpetrators of pain, ridicule and harassment. “Jolly Green Giant, Ho, Ho, Ho” became their taunt of choice. As the voices got nearer of the loudest of the pack, I turned to face them coming and looked straight into their eyes, peaceably, without a word. My prayers were answered as they passed me by still laughing, yet moving onward. I remember thinking about how the nuns told us not to react upon seeing a pack of dogs on the way to school – Stop, do not run. Look past the dogs, don’t let them smell your fear. In this case, I was able to remain calm. Soon thereafter, the bus stopped and I boarded a crowded bus, that soon emptied as it moved out of the strange neighborhood I knew nothing about.
And there you have it!
I snapped a couple of pics and rushed inside to see what I’d got. One of them was a gem. It was taken at 2:29am on Monday, August 14th, 2006. I figured this would be your birthday moon photo.
It's used to measure the light needed to obtain a correct exposure suggesting both shutter time and aperture to use depending on the ISO that we have set... READ MORE
3/4 tsp. citric acid dissolved in 1/2 c. purified water
I just hope they leave the elf hat in the box.
Tel Aviv University’s decision to allow a Nakba Day ceremony on Monday on the campus is “erroneous and outrageous,” Education Minister Gideon Sa’ar said on Sunday.
Over the past few years we've seen articles that mention how some businesses use music to drive away troublesome customers or loiterers; usually the music chosen was classical or even country music. I wonder why? Why not rap or hip-hop or 'urban' top 40 style?
The answer: The cookies can look like the moon phases and make for a special and yummy homeschool lesson as we continue our Apologia Astronomy studies this year.
I noticed something about myself when I was recording our little loping session, though. I got nervous! Thinking about how many people might watch, and perhaps criticize, made me nervous and no doubt changed the way I rode my horse. This had an impact on Lilly as well, and I found her a bit more forward than she usually is and a couple times she jumped the gun and tried to lope without my requesting it. She hasn't done that in weeks!
Finally, it’s possible to avoid Wi-Fi networks altogether and connect to the internet through a wireless carrier. For this totally mobile service you will likely pay $50.00 – $60.00 /month. Wireless carriers use encryption when transferring data. For your mobile device you’ll probably need a large or unlimited GB plan. Laptops will require a special device that plugs into a port like a flash drive.
“It’s just like Japan, only a mirror image,” said Gerard Fryer, a geophysicist at the University of Hawaii and the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center.
I ran out of instinct
Earthquakes, Storms, Snowstorms, Extreme Rain Events (ERE), Drought and Deluge, Fatigue … Antiphase and all other human-induced and human-enhanced factors.
That speaks in an eloquent language, all by itself.
Check out this new site, I am sure it will be The Everygirls go-to source for inspiration and information. Like having a girlfriend in-the-know, you know, someone you can ask all the silly questions you kinda think you probably should know the answers to already, but don't...
'Prepared to endure anything, and go through everything. We shall be allowed candles now, I suppose.'
I've got a friend who frequently refers to "ennui." I feel pretensious using that word, though it is the most apt description of what i feel so frequently. I've found that when I have a bout of the bittersweet prelude to depression, I like to go through antique stores. My favorites are the massive antique malls with hundreds of stalls. I like that you have absolutely no way to predict what will be inside, and that you have to be willing to spend a lot of time looking to really see everything that they have to offer. I love the bizarre handicrafts that find their way there, as if everyone has desperately been seeking hand-knit yellow yarn coasters, or a babydoll's head fashioned in a window in a suitcase. I love the old games, and how very topical they were at one point in time. I love that people genuinely seem to think that I'm going to spend $65 on an old pack of Welcome Back, Kotter trading cards with the gum still intact. I think the best part is coming across something you used to have, and being overwhelmed by all of the associations you have with it. And of course, I love the whole wtf element of any antique store. Why do people keep the things that they do? And why was so much of purchased by antique traders to pass on to others? So much of it is just odd garbage that really needs nothing more than a quick trip to the rubbish bin.
The only specific “offence” charged relates to the Insolvency Event. Other than that, the charges lack any specification at all.
Reader,I had to restrain myself from going back over to the table and telling them that we might well live to fight another day without the flaming tip.
Needless to say, having waited for a couple of minutes without any sight or sound of my drink appearing, I left.
It’s now the 13th and I’ve not received a call from any subs. It’s bad enough that I will either need to take time off work or switch with someone at work causing me to work less than desirable hours but then this lack of communication to occur? Damn.
The Service - Head Vs Wall (Pravda 1990)
Once the paint has fully dried, pop them into a cold oven, set it to 140 celcius and let them bake them for 30 minutes. Easy.
"Gracious Elf," spoke up Jalal. "If that be true I must ask you for your help. There are others held captive, they have worked alongside me and one I hold dear to me as kin."
Somehow I just know
I try to make a mental note to try to get the things that I need next time I am at the store. But just about every time, my husband comes home with them. I never say directly to him that I need something but he always hears me. So something as small as coming home with a new umbrella for me, or a double pack of contact solution so I don't run out, says SO much. He IS always thinking of me. So even though it's not a card, or flowers, or something else mushy like that, I think his "gifts" say so much more than that. They tell me that he is always listening to me and making his own mental notes to try to fulfill my needs. I value that so much more.
Ay yi yi!
With two starting gates in use for the 20-horse field, post 14 is the outside of the first gate and post 15 (Gemologist) is the inside post in the auxiliary gate, allowing both horses freedom of movement because of the gap between the two gates. This allows both jockeys to survey what is happening out of the gates and decide their best routes at the outset.
Other than being conditioned as a child to see intelligence as extremely important, it probably has a lot to do with the idea of survival. It seems you also need to be intelligent to be powerful. Granted there are dumb powerful people who are not so bright but they probably gained their power through family or sheer luck. Intelligent, powerful people are also usually wealthy people. Attributes that even I appreciate.
I worked it out as accurately as possible – the number of days, the photocopying, the train tickets – and asked for exactly that, with a breakdown of how I’d come to my figure. Given that the partner in Associated Newspapers’ law firm had warned me a trial would cost upwards of £100,000, I could have plucked a number from thin air and added a few zeros. But it was never about the money. It was the principle. It was about standing up to a corporation that thought nothing of using my image, my name and my location alongside a story purporting to be about me, in my own words, but that bore no resemblance to my life or my values. It was about wanting them to accept responsibility for the damage they’d done to my life.
*started pointing at EVERYTHING - it is the cutest thing
n childbirth; postpartum depression; salvation at birth, and several more i=
I will never forget the way she dropped her head and the tears rolled off her face as the sniffles began. My heart broke and I began to question our decision to end our marriage. “Maybe I should wait,” I thought. Yet, I knew we were right to end it. Just, what kid thinks their parents are going to split up? What kid desires their family and all they saw as real to disintegrate in a few words, “Your mother and I have decided we need to split up”?
I always liked reading & it was about the age of 10 that I first discovered The Hobbit, I drew me in so completely that I wanted more, I was happy to discover Tolkien had written The Lord of the Rings and remember begging for relatives to buy me each book for Christmas or my Birthday, I re-read it over & over as I waited for the next relative to buy me one. By the end of grade 6, I think I had read the entire book about 10 times. But still my thirst for more of Middle-Earth wasn't sated, I played with Tolkien's Elvish runes & language in the Appendices of The Return of the King, devoured the brief histories & family trees.
Second is an event that’s a little farther off, the Locally Grown fundraiser happening at and for Harvest Noon Café! It’s a similar sort of deal: lots of bands (Auto Manic, Ottilie Kate, Bones Howe, and Nicole Diver and the Post-war Surfers) and lots of good food (menu is still TBD, but I’m thinking some sort of vegan pizza will be in order). It’s also a great chance for all y’all who are busy weekday afternoons to come check out Harvest Noon and get a sense of what we’re all about. This one’s on Friday, March 2, and cover is PWYC (with a suggested WYC of $5).
and brave men are left to fend for themselves
To tide you all over, here's todays stationery:
I have a HUGE prayer team praying for me and my church, Ignite Church. They have been faithfully praying about our facility needs. After a long time, many visits, lots of phone calles, prayers were answered. We have a location set!
On this bad boy, two songs stand out. One is “Crazy You”, a ballad sung in his signature falsetto voice as he strums an acoustic guitar. Second would be “Soft and Wet”, a funky, synthesizer number co-written with Chris Moon.
Impunity, as defined by National Union of Journalists in the Philippines-Bulacan Chapter (NUJP-Bulacan) Chairman Dino Balabo, is one’s exemption from punishment or loss or escape from jurisdiction. Or simply put, impunity is a state of being lawless — and that isn’t the kind of thing to be proud of.
Crops
In bigger-picture news, I see that the Miss Universe pageant has reinstated Jenna Talackova by backing off the alleged "natural born woman" requirement (details here, and here). They've said she can compete so long as she can provide appropriate gender recognition documentation just like any other competitor, and similar to other competitions. That is absolutely the way it should have been all along, and it's nice to see that all of this pressure has had an impact.
I am always trying to plan my life and control my emotions. I am ever prepared to sacrifice my emotions for career and future. Maybe that’s what I found attractive in you at first. Narcissistic people get attracted to their mirror image. And it didn’t take long for me to realize that your plate is indeed full. There is no space for me (or any other girl for that matter) in your carefully structured, very busy life.
Even though I had healthy options available to me for food I didn’t choose them. I kept reaching for my comfort food stand by’s… carbs, carbs, and carbs, and did I mention sweets?
I might not die tomorrow, but I'm doing what wise people say to do before it's too late. I'm writing love letters. To you. Yes, to you! Of course you know I love you. Heaps and heaps. And because I love you, I scold you when you do something wrong. I even punish you when the wrong is too much. You don't like it but it's for your own good. One day when you are parents yourselves, you'll see the reason why it works.
This illustrates the importance of increasing one’s faith through prayer, allowing divine grace to flow through us to manifest loving fruits of faith and studying Scripture. We can always exhibit more love for others as well as deepen our relationship with Christ. If we consider our relationship with Christ in the way we would an earthly friendship, we find that if we do not keep in touch with our friends, is it any wonder that we stop thinking about them eventually? Out of sight, out of mind. Our earlier love and devotion to them disappear over time.
So loved—O you banner leading the day with stars brought from the
So there you have it, 65 of the 72 cards I have.
am I now;
Blogging: I've posted, and thanks to everyone for coming by - I will visit all your blogs soon!
Then we were talking about not making big messes and getting into things like scissors and somehow Isabelle starts asking about what happens if Daddy makes a machine that can make more kids and we end up with two more Isabelles. Heaven help me if that were to happen.
My house, I fear, will not be saying, "Look what a good housekeeper T.K. was."
Can you tell how passionately I feel about this subject? I'll be stepping down from my soapbox now, since I expect you came here looking for a recipe, not a sermon. I did, however, want to clarify that my blog has absolutely nothing to do with the art of photography (although, I must say, I've gotten a tiny bit better at it, and I'm enjoying it enough to possibly consider something other than my daughter's point and shoot camera - but I'm not sure I would know how it worked or have the time to figure it out).
But neither do you want an DJ/MC who’s a wallflower, inarticulate, soft-spoken, unable to command attention, more comfortable buried in his headphones and staring at his mixer than addressing an audience on the microphone. TOO LIGHT.
Can you imagine it would help?
Trying to keep Trevor from climbing would have been as effective as telling him not to breathe. It was in his blood, it was who he was. I signed him up for gymnastics classes hoping that if I couldn’t keep him from climbing, at least he would be taught how to fall safely.
Here's their pitch:
ohh! so frustrated. since i am a little sick, all my cooking efforts are drowning in vain. I never thought i would be throwing what i cook. eesh! bitter gourds, my first trial at cooking these and trust me, i had to spit the first bite, it was sooo bitter in taste. plus, the red kidney beans (Rajma) i prepared today, eww! it was just not ready to boil down. trust me, i had never wasted so much of LPG in my life. one hour on the gas, and i had also left it overnight and still. what a pain it is. It is bad is if you do not know how to cook, but it is worse when you know it and still it does not go the right way.
And if you truly believe Harry Potter movies will harm your children then the “The Wizard of Oz” should be banned as well.
At least our ram-rod circle
although this party is called my insta.week, you don't have to have instagram or even an iphone. any camera phone photo will do! you can make a blog post dedicated to your week in instagrams, or you can link up a blog post with only one instagram photo. it doesn't matter! i just want those camera shots! also, you don't even have to have a blog to participate. link up from your flickr account or any other photo sharing site.
“That neighbor of yours is a witch, or I’m a bull toad. Some people are scared of her, but I ain’t afraid to speak my mind.”
This is my second bottled offering from Flossmoor. I was a fan of the brown ale that I had, and I've got high hopes for this beer. They actually brew several varieties of IPAs, and you can tell what one you are having based on the wax top on the bottles. They use the same bottle for each of their IPAs. This blue wax topped bomber is the Lady Columbia IPA.
Macaroni cheese was about the only pasta we had in the fifties, although gradually spaghetti appeared – not because it was unknown but because, I suppose it was not available. There was of course Heinz tinned spaghetti in tomato sauce, served on toast and at tea-times rather than lunch times. I don’t remember rationing, although it was still happening when I was a small child. Macaroni cheese as far as I can remember was uncooked macaroni, milk, butter, cheese and seasoning. Sometimes there would be slice tomatoes on the top, and a dusting of pepper. With meals like macaroni cheese and shepherd’s pie, one of the delicious treats was the crispy stuff stuck round the sides of the dish.
The video follows me on a little tour of Paris. For the film buffs among you, you will be interested to learn that all the traveling footage of Paris-by-night was taken from the back of my beloved Vespa. The film-maker, Jethro, displayed nerves of steel to hang one-handed from the back of Mojito as I cruised past some of the city's best known monuments.
I know a great lady who is moving this week. Her life has changed and she is taking on some new challenges and opportunities, and moving is part of the deal. She arranged a last-minute late night for all of her close friends the other night, where we ate and sat in a big circle and laughed and talked. We offered up personal anecdotes about life and shared common experiences with mothering and wifing. Boy, was it food for this soul.
Mission accomplished.
Nope, I'm Intrepid Harpist. And it's my job.
So, I opened a new box of those Swiffer dusters today (yes, very not green of me). This new box is scented - which I did not realize - "lavender and vanilla". Reminds me of the talcum powder old ladies use to dust their privates with....
I just received a CD in the mail yesterday from a company that is educating new talent, and telling them that you can start your own voiceover company with a fully equipped studio for “A few hundred dollars”. On the CD, this person who states that they have made more than a Million Dollars as a Voice artist, and is obligated to “Share” the opportunity (3 day workshop) with all the future talent out there at a cost of eleven hundred dollars.
Its been a Blast watching my DD grow and change, all for the better, and seeing her personality develop and watch her become the person she is.
the light from Proxima Centauri
Kathy and I shared the Microsoft Word classes amicably enough, but trouble arose in the area of databases. Kathy and a teacher named Richard shared the database classes. Richard was a friednly and easy-going person, but he began developing a new database class. Kathy (with little justification) began to regard Richard’s work as “stealing database classes” from her.
Thu-AM: 1:33, 2800' ~ Green Mt.
Cast: Stanley Baker, David McCallum, Peter Cushing, Anne Heywood, John Slater, Clifford Evans, Melvyn Hayes, Freddie Starr
common interests and similarities. Moreover, women want to be with someone whom
Myers leaned forward. “I don’t think that analogy applies here, we -"
Is it possible to fall in love with someone you’ve never met? Imogen Summers thinks so – because it’s happened to her.
Me: No, what are you like.
Pull ups – chin over bar, full extension at the bottom
The truth is that “free trade” is a really bad deal for the average American worker. In the emerging one world economic system, labor has become a global commodity and U.S. workers must now compete for jobs with people on the other side of the planet.
It is a simple game board and cards, but has 6 great games and activities.
This is probably my favourite book of poetry and though I’ve read the quoted lines many times, they never resonated as deeply as recently. It’s very true that I have found my life again, but what draws me especially is, “Chanting, I settle into my breath.” Not just the idea of the chant but how comfortable and casually it fits into T’ao Ch’ien’s life and moment.
Alas, here we are again.
in the quiet and peace
now I don't care
disappointments, both of them.
Sotheby's
Preparing dinner, later viewing the PBS News Hour I listen to talk of Middle East uprisings with speculations repeating no one knows what the outcome will be. Problems in Africa when a leader refuses to relinquish his office to a popularly elected replacement. The day is coming to an end. Tomorrow I'll shop for grocery items I need in the house to prepare for an upcoming colonoscopy. The preparation experience always seems worse than the procedure.
So, off we went to the Blue & Gold, with me scared out of my wits having to face the boy I just hit and ran. When we got there, I scanned the room and there was Mitchell with a black eye! Now I figured I was in real trouble. I wasn’t proud of giving him a shiner and I wasn’t happy that I threw a punch. I felt sick seeing him. But, he came up to me and as he approached, I wanted to run so fast.
He is suffering from mental health issues (aren’t all suicide bombers?) and is holding four people hostage in Tottenham Court Road.
Sometimes it’s the last thing I check before I sleep and
Niiiiyyeeece….Hintz by name, gives hints by nature.
Shall I show the reason that I am finally able to be tidy? Here is the second chest of drawers I have been waiting for. The idea is to keep a drawer for each sewing pattern, so as I cut out pieces they can go straight in a drawer. Each drawer is removeable, so when I am working I can have the relevant drawer by the side of me.
So, let it be known, archery isn’t as tame as it may seem from the outside.
That I've never said before
Before all of this gets properly under way, “Together for Berlin” hold an open air service, to pray for the city and particularly for a peaceful day. Very special!
I laughed out loud when Sonia Yaco said “archivists do not have broad or deep habits of collaboration” (p.3). While our curmudgeon ways are stereotypical, I also think that is debatable. I agree, workflow is definitely key and letting catalogers or metadata specialists in on the process is extremely successful. You can not only apply authority language in the scope and content notes, but Archivist’s Toolkit allows for controlled subject headings attached to the record, but then later when the finding aid is mounted on the web, the job is easier to add notes or other genre fields. AT also generates EAD. I do not have much to do with the process of encoding *yet*, with a on-site supportive IT department, it is a breeze, but I find that everyone involved in the processing should have some knowledge of EAD. As far as I’m concerned, taking institutional knowledge, including compliance procedures with you, when you retire is extremely detrimental.
MULHARE Edward A., 85 died peacefully at his home in Longboat Key, Florida on February 24, 2012. A resident of Florida, he had previously been a resident of River Edge, NJ and a parishioner of St. Peter the Apostle Church for over 50 years. Ed Mulhare, born in Kingston NY in 1926, was a devoted and beloved husband and father. He is survived by his wife of 61 years, Kathleen Kinross Mulhare (Kay); sons, Keith Mulhare of Ridgewood NJ and Drew Mulhare of Williamsburg VA; daughter, Lisa Sanderson of Landenberg PA; daughter-in-law, Mary Mulhare of Williamsburg VA; sister, Mary Lockwood of Stamford, CT. Kay and Ed's eldest son, USAF Major Ross Mulhare, died in the line of duty in 1986 as a test pilot for the stealth fighter development program. Ed and Kay Mulhare also had fourteen grandchildren and twelve great-grandchild-ren. Edward Mulhare was deeply loved by his family and friends. He served in the U.S. Army during the Korean War and had also served in the Merchant Marines. Ed earned a BS degree from Boston University and a MBA degree from Fairleigh Dickinson University. He led a successful career as an investment professional having served as a VP of Prudential Financial, an Executive VP of Republic Bank and the founding Chairman and C.E.O. of Merrill Lynch Interfunding. He also served on the board of directors of several privately held companies. Funeral from the Beaugard Funeral Home, 869 Kinder-kamack Rd., River Edge, where his family will receive friends on Wednesday evening 7-9 PM. A Mass of Christian Burial will be on Thursday at 10:30 AM at St. Peter the Apostle Church. Interment is at George Washington Memorial Park Cemetery in Paramus. Donations may be made in memory of Edward Mulhare to the American Diabetes Association , www.diabetes.org. Published in The Record/Herald News on February 28, 2012
Here's hoping you all will be blessed with good health and happiness in this new year....and as always, would appreciate you comments and visits again.
Doggie: E17, 15, 13, 42, 41, 40, dark umber and french grey 70% pencils
2-24-2012 was the worst day of my life. I sat in front of a judge as he decited the fate of Livia my 6 year old daughter. I tried so hard to prove that IL had no right to rule in my custody case! But I didn’t get the paper work I needed from Louisville, KY in time!
Omelets are fast and simple to make, a great source of protien, and can be combined with any kind of vegetable.
Last week, in a photo-sharing website also governed by Planet Google's web empire, I spotted a lovely picture of the Greek island of Santorini. It is a place I have visited myself - a rather unique volcanic island basking in bright Aegean sunshine. I was in this Greek contributor's album because he'd left some encouraging comments beside some of my own pictures.
The wedding shower is tomorrow afternoon. Last night I did a thorough deep cleaning of the livingroom and half heartedly steam cleaned the carpet. It looks it. I didn't realize the dogs were kicking off THAT much hair until I pulled out our loveseat. *stupid dogs*
Europa Press, Murcia
I was absolutely charmed by this story. This is my first Elizabeth Bevarly novel, and I'm not quite sure why I haven't read her work before, but I can tell you - after this book, I will be on the lookout for more of her books.
It's easy to be a fan of Priscilla Jade lingerie. Her previous collection raised black mesh and lace to sophisticated new heights, and her size range is incredibly inclusive. Whether you're a size zero or a size sixteen, you'll find something to love.
I found these two tops at H&M on 42nd st & 5th ave for $5 each, they are pretty great and very airy. Paired with some retro style gym shorts and some giant turquoise sunglasses.... yep. :)
The result of practicing Sanchin is that the performer will fully perceive, unify and absorb not only his physical and spiritual self, but also the energy of the external environment in which he exists. The effect of such synchronization can truly be said to produce an almost incomprehensible, yet empirical result; a superhuman or hyper-human state whereby all manner of physical, mental and spiritual feats are possible. The resultant synchronization of Mind-Body-Universe is nurtured and further cultivated through the ritual and devoted practice of Seienchin and Suparunpei as codified in Jiriki Kata-Do. (See Endnote # 4)
Today's card features one of our In Colours, Wisteria Wonder. I started by stamping the super large Medallion background stamp in the Wisteria Wonder ink on the matching cardstock. Love that tone-on-tone effect.
What had happened? If media reports are to be believed, then Prince Ernst August of Hanover appears to have somewhat of a reputation, having allegedly once been involved in a skirmish with a cameraman and the owner of nightclub owner in Kenya. This reputation was picked up by satirical advertisement campaign by a cigarette maker which used an advert depicting a battered cigarette packet together with he slogan "Was that Ernst? Or August?" The Prince was not amused and took the matter to the German courts, which initially decided in his favour.
I am a dog person.
Fortunately, I have a very patient husband, technical wizards for sons, and some very helpful blogging friend ( step forward, Jinksy and Dr. FTSE). But will I ever be able to go,it alone?
I got inspired by the movie "Deutschland - ein Sommermärchen" (Germany: a summer's fairy tale). A movie about the German national soccer team during the World Championship 2006 here in Germany. It's not only about the soccer team, but also the atmosphere all over Germany. Since that World Championship the Germans wear their national colours with pride again... even though we didn't make it to the World Champion!
Time to get that bird in the oven!
"At times we're just going through the motions," he said, standing up as we sat down on the grass drinking tap water. "When we're defending throws, then yeah, I want you stood in front of whoever our centre-back is marking, but if the ball goes back to the thrower then you run, and I mean run your bollocks off to close him down."
These matters are original documents, except can be made a longer period.
This has definately been my favourite lip combo of the month. I've worn it over and over again because it just works with any makeup. Both products are super cheap (I did get the gloss from a blogsale) but fantastic quality. The gloss is a pretty peachy nude and the lipstick, although it looks quite orange-toned in the picture, is a peachy pink nude and is perfect for my skintone.
As our days are nearing and even prior we knew that time was going to be valuable with some of our closest friends. After all, moves change people and I wanted our last visits with some people to be memorable. Because, let's face it who knows if everyone I am close to in VA will stay that way once we're halfway across the country or even world.
Seriously, it’s like every single day, more uniforms emerge. Help me tell Mr. President that, committees for everything under the sun can keep appearing in The House but on our streets, we need to know those whom we are dealing with.
So that when you're re-reading something you wrote a long time ago, you can still see the positive in the work - and by extension, the humanity in yourself.
Bare not your own fruits of nectar without your own consent (permission). You are in Divine Truth a Master of your own destiny and Heaven awaits your Glory to be risen, as is he, Jesus Christ of Nazereth. Amen.
I found a piece of ribbon to use (must have been from a gift I received) and looped it through the hole I punched in the tag. Then I wrapped it around the rim of the jar and tied a bow. I cried I was so proud.
So there you have our latest adventure. And I still haven't told you about the other stuff that's happened in the last few weeks! Baring any new emergencies I'll tell you about that very soon...
Above are the demo beads, and pictures, from the lapidary class this past weekend at Indy Flame Art. It was the first time for me to teach this class, so I kept enrollment to five. We had so much fun, and everyone made great beads. I plan to schedule another class very soon!
I’ve extracted stories with coaxing,
My program for day 9 of the Tom Venuto challenge only consisted of 35mins of Skipping for the cardio as the pepper was still causing some inconvenience.
I was able to do what He needed but I must admit that I was surprised to be asked this early on to help someone else. I don’t mind, but… O.o I think it’s proof that they are short handed.
1. The Thermals - I Let It Go
I'm here today to talk about a long overdue project I completed over the weekend: a headboard for our bed!
Today we will do something different and we will get to know better one of my sponsors. Her name is Allice and she is the shop owner of TutuLand.
So we made biscuits. And they were good!
- Memories warm you up from inside, but they also tear you apart.
Pigmania
Here's Loda Lake itself.
So as the year progresses I have decided to continue my photo diary and see how many different family groups I actually have in my garden.
If I’ve missed something here, or if you’ve got any questions at all, please don’t hesitate to raise them in the comments. We’re looking forward to having you all along for the ride again this year. Jump onboard.
Now that was one example of a very intelligent person. And we know intelligence comes at various levels, with varying impact. The point is, because some (or perhaps most) people do not have the access to the assistance or guidance of education, what they could have potentially achieved then becomes our loss. By “our” I don’t just mean Malaysia and I don’t just mean our era. Think big picture, think Einstein.
He didn’t seem that impressed. ‘I hope you know what you’re doing,’ he replied. ‘I’ve had to leave the otters frisking in the bath.’
“The sand is everything else…The small stuff. If you put the sand into the jar first, there is no room for the pebbles or the golf balls. The same goes for life. If you spend all your time and energy on the small stuff, you will never have room for the things that are critical to your happiness.”
Those are profound statements that truly do preach humility and compassion and revive faith in the New Testament.
stitched grid
If you follow the pickled cabbage droppings through the Marais, you will find your way to the Rue des Rosiers. This is where the best falafel sandwich in Europe is said to be. And, after wandering around for a couple hours and not really feeling like sitting for one of my usual salads, it’s where I gravitated towards this afternoon.
Along with Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act (Section 504) and the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA), the 1975 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) — which guarantees students with disabilities a “free appropriate public education” — has improved the lives of millions of children and their families. This improvement has not come without costs, however, both financial and human.
The beach at Sairee … not the best beach (by Thailand standards, very very high standards!), but still very beautiful when a longtail boat isn’t ripping by! :S
Here is small portion of the apples we did, soaking in a lemon juice solution, waiting for their turn in the pot.
Joe told me that if he could, he would be a part of my day. And he was.
I feel a particularly sharp elbow from one side and hear a faint continued chant on the other. I look behind me to see a group of 4 feet tall grannies chatting trying to make their way to the gate. I attempt to shield them from the elbows and shoving as we are pushed ever-closer to the Seokguram Bell. It occurs to me at this point that I have lost sight of Hiro and Hideki.
I John 4:19 says that we love because he first loved us, not the other way around. We can’t earn God’s love. We already had it before we even existed. God knew us before we were born.
All together I spent an estimated 20 hours designing and redesigning these items. It is much more fulfilling than going to a big box store and buying garbage that will get used a few times and discarded. If you are like me and not so good at making things COMPLETELY from scratch (although I AM trying to learn), I recommend using a service like these that provide an art design program that allows you to add text, shapes, borders, etc to your favorite photos.
smiling with you.
Sometimes amidst all the pundits, political nonsense, and 'round the clock news that ain't news coverage... I see reality slowly turning back the clock. The anti-freedom and anti-gun folks on the east and west coasts, in New York, Chicago, California, and inside the beltway around Washington D. C. seem to have forgotten or maybe selectively edited out the rest of the country.
You can find something similar to this locally at ELF counters,
Today would normally be Book Review Monday. I’m behind in my writing. Sorry. Life has been a bit more “interesting” of late than I expected it to be….in a good way.
9. Talk to the captain, and he teaches you his first lesson. In order to sail a boat, you need 5 things:
It was really tiring to walk around. I walk around so as not to miss any building. I remember the time when I was doing the survey for our thesis. It was like this. The heat of the sun that tries to penetrate through my umbrella and the smoke from the vehicles.
So tell me…what was the last healthy thing you did?
- italians responded with cheers to jovanotti's prompts (in italian), knew words, sang along, especially to old hits
This iris is blooming right now. The ones that came from my parents property are blooming at the neighbors but mine will be a few more days to open. She has them planted on the north side of the house and one would think they would bloom earlier than ones that are out in the sun.
Of course we know more about the white killers, but that is because the media focus on them, whilst ignoring the legion of black killers who do not fit the profile they like to present. The Sunday Morning Slasher, Coral Eugene Watts is suspected of being America's most prolific serial killer ever, with possibly as many as 80 to 100 victims, however, who has ever heard of him? Likewise Lorenzo Gilyard, Matthew Macon, Shelly Andre Brooks, Chester Turner, Carlton Gary and Andre Crawford, to name but a few, are men would certainly never appear on most popular lists of serial killers, but that's what they are.
The decline from last weeks Intermediate wave B at SPX 1393 clearly looks like Intermediate wave C. Thus far, we have had a three wave decline to SPX 1370, which we labeled Minor A. Then a rally to SPX 1387, which we labeled Minor B. Minor C is underway now. As soon as the OEW 1363 pivot range, (1356-1370), fails, the steep part of this declining wave should be underway. We continue to look for a correction low between SPX 1300 and 1340, and ideally between 1313 and 1327. Short term support is at the 1363 pivot and SPX 1340, with resistance at the 1372 and 1386 pivots. Short term momentum is nearly back to neutral after getting extremely oversold.
This is not a weekend project. It involves gesso-like crackle paint, antiquing solution, and a lot of distressing. Here's what to do:
1. Plan meals
Winterson, 53, is best known for her 1985 debut novel, Oranges Are Not the Only Fruit, published soon after she left Oxford University. She will take up her post in October and teach both undergraduates and MA students, as well as giving four public lectures each year.
Serve warm or at room temp.
ride there when they found grandma dead on the couch
No matter how hard I ponder and how much info I collect, I just can't seem to find the right solution for Bryn and our family. I don't think my kid is a genius, but the work they are doing in her class is not keeping her challenged. I don't even think it has so much to do with the fact that she already knows most of the things they are doing, it is just that she doesn't need 2 weeks to grasp a new concept. I realize that one teacher can't individualize a lesson plan for each student, but I do know it doesn't seem to be working for my kid. And I doubt she is the only one. I don't know how to fix it, but teaching to the middle leaves kids out on both ends of the spectrum. And throwing her in a "gifted" program for less than 2 hours a week as the solution to the problem is almost insulting.
Girsh said in a written statement that the victim’s injuries were consistent with being dragged and were pronounced on his face, upper body, neck and hands. Extreme cold also may have also played a role. When he was found, Christopher Beckham was wearing only a T-shirt, blue jeans and boots.
1 pound 9x14-inch frozen phyllo dough, thawed in the refrigerator overnight
you have a child who never lets you take a picture of her.
So tomorrow it’s back to Bubba! I’m still deciding how far I want to go on Thursday, because Friday I’m taking some students on a field trip to D.C. for a walking tour of Roman-inspired architecture, and we’ll be covering several miles at least. And then I have a nine-mile training run on Saturday, and I’m definitely following through with this one! We’ll see how it goes.
Seductive. All it takes is a higher end brand than Calvin Klein pro stretch are really comfortable, you never get hot or feel uncomfortable. The original series is also worn for support and a bra you'll wonder how you ever lived without. Sexy fabric - a blend of 87% Cotton and 9% Elastane you're sure to enjoy every pound of CK 1 a top choice for casual use perfume. Packed in 1.70 oz bottles and weighing 0.30 lbs, you are a woman, it's for you.
King’s Landing: Tyrion has officially accepted the fact his nephew is a raging psychopath that can’t be saved. Cersei gets wasted and that’s hilarious. Tyrion wants to know what they plan to do about the coming army, and it looks like there’s something to do with barrels of wildfire. Tyrion is smart so he’s starting to think about what can be done to save all of them. They have inferior forces and Stannis is coming. He’s also hurt to hear that most of the commoners blame him for Joffrey’s bad decisions.
Over the past few months I’ve shared a few reasons why insurance rates continue to go up, up, up. From the property side, weather and fires are the biggest culprits in the upward spiral of rates.
and out
DARKNESS.
question asked in the process described by Byron Katie is this: “Who would you be without your story?” She has created four questions that lead you into self-exploration of your beliefs, and leads you out of the need to cling to your story. Peace and freedom are the end result.
Gender: For some reason Ryan is all the sudden thinking GIRL. Where did that come from?! I think its because he really really wants a boy so he is preparing himself for a GIRL. I am 100% certain its a boy. I just have a strong feeling. I will probably throw up in excitement if it turns out to be a GIRL.
So as we work to our first weekend of the year, remember also that too much chatter will endanger your goals. Keep a few cards up your sleeve. One of those cards should be your goals. Do not speak too soon. It will hurt your credibility. Of course, tell whoever you are accountable to. But remember the value of your goals, lies in the achieving them and not talking about them.
The Jester and The King laughed,
I liked many of the poems, but I’ll conclude with one that I particularly enjoyed, labeled A26:
This could not be simpler- vegetables are simmered in stock, seasoned with a chili black bean sauce, and the soup is finished off by cooking potstickers right in the soup.
--great beers
People generally prefer choosing a traditional business cards printing firm within their locality just because of the belief they are not so costly. They have a misconception. There are many online companies providing top quality personalized Printing at a very reasonable price.
Q: Sebastian, the pit-stop cost you the lead but were Ferrari on to you today? What do you think?
This is a close-up of the title of my page. I decided to use a button instead of the regular dot for my 'i'. I added a bow with some twine from Papertrey Ink. The stamp is from the set "Turn That Frown Upside Down" by My Creative Time.
The greenpaper on Self Government for Tobago is out. The AG, who we aint hear from in a while, couldn’t resist pointing out that the PNM didn’t consider this in 2010…and that the PP making good on it’s manifesto promise of 2010….I’ll wait to hear Orville’s word on it An&, especially since the last I heard the paper not really in the interest of Tobagonians at all.
8) Reading your pitch aloud to a group of relative strangers can help you to polish it and improve. This was a fantastic workshop run by Jackie Marchant and I want to repeat it for every book I have ever written and will write in the future.
Ni Hao, Ni Hao that means hello, and
In the Frank Miller drawing, he uses lots of detail on Batman and Robin's forms to describe them. Therefore, since the cape overlaps Batman, it looks far better to have it create a clean swath of blank area laid over his areas of detail. It works really well to create the illusion that it's really overlapping his forms and that there's a three-dimensional, solid figure lying behind that cape.
It turns out I have a chick of my own who is growing into a caring, delightful young woman who recognizes that although she can’t control life, she can still actively participate in it appreciating what she has. Who knew?
One thing that I have learned about blogging, is that the world opens up and you make friends with people in different parts of the country and in the world. The world of blogging reduces the world to a small intimate circle. Blogging, I have made friends that I might have never known in my lifetime. What I have found about blogging is that I have received so much more than I have ever given.
this emptiness,
I read absolutely everything and it’s rare I can’t find something to like in a book I’ve read. I read a lot of YA, sci-fi, fantasy and paranormal. I also enjoy literary fiction and the classics. I think the trick to being a good writer is to have a very big tool box and you don’t get
He had walked the streets of rain-soaked Mumbai for the last four days. A rucksack hung limply on his shoulders with all his belongings. A toilet bag, a change of clothes, a few coins and some apples were all that he took when he left home.
A TV source also revealed to Daily Mirror: “Cheryl has been working on new material for months. She is determined to relaunch herself as a credible artist and The Voice will be the perfect platform to showcase her latest tracks.
"I had everything I needed to run a household: a house, food, and a new family. From now on it would just be me and Sammy–the two of us, and no one else."
LENGTH: Original:85:14 Remaster: 87:54
Here's what I have on my schedule...not very complete since I've been slacking while on vacation, but it's a start!
“I feel for the white man who got beat up at the light,” wrote one person.
And I guess he especially didn’t find it funny when Mailman Mike suggested that he could play the baby Jesus in the nativity scene on one person’s lawn and I yelled “Do it! Get out! Take off your clothes!”. Captain Carl was all “Knock it off, Marcy” and I was all “What? We’re having fun.” and he was all “Just STOP.”
It’s almost impossible to detect spy software once it’s on your phone, so take steps to protect your privacy. Some measures include shutting off Bluetooth when it’s not in use, understanding and using a phone’s security features, regularly clearing the phone’s memory and using security software, which is also inexpensive.
He takes after The Daddy that way. He is our little athlete. :)
Another piece of the jig-saw would have seen the Internet Resources Newsletter merged into the POG service as a current awareness element.
Many parents have destroyed the future of the children because they didn’t give them the right training at the beginning.
One of the traits of outstanding leaders is that they properly place people within a team. Good leaders have the ability to see their people, sense where they are and put them in the right place. So why do so many leaders place so many people in so many wrong places? I’ve identified five reasons.
Solitude Digital Scrapbooking Kit
So there you go. Too. Much. Information. Only, if I have thought it, then plenty of you have thought it too. My children are gifts and so will be the next one or two but I think we have enough presents for the time being... with Christmas coming and all :)
Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Grease a 9x5 loaf pan and set aside. In the bowl of a stand mixer fitted with the paddle attachment, cream the butter on medium-high speed. Add sugar, and beat until fluffy, about 3 minutes.
We've been house hunting and I think have found one that could be a possibility. I feel it needs some upgrades and remodeling. The one area I'm obsessed with right now is the dining room.
Then Paul gets specific sharing two specifics in finding God’s direction:
The scholars were unanimous in calling the situation in some of the Muslim countries as demonstration of modern sedition (fitna) and that the only solution to the misfortune befalling the Ummah is to seek refuge in Islam and the Tradition of the Prophet (peace be upon him).
I loved this book so much I could eat it up…again and again.
I loved the answer, and it was one of many things I heard from Golia that afternoon. Another gem was in relation to the people complaining about public art. “There's a difference,” Golia said,” between public art and art in public.” He was exactly right. Every obscure billboard you see with an artist's work on it, every lame sculpture propped up in a park -- this is art in public and not public art. The art is made for somewhere else (galleries, museums), and its current location doesn't matter and neither does the public.
"Last weekend, I had to divert an alien invasion, stop a star exploding and buy some new slippers, all without moving! Still, it seems to have fooled the Silence. Unless they read Doctor Who Adventures, of course… Oh dear."
Yep. He sure was. He went right around my car, running over a flare as he did so, and then began trying to angle around the car that was being pushed by my other officers.
The world know very well that fair, free and transparent governance is essential demand and right for all nations without exceptions. The USA, France and Britain are increasingly imposing non-peaceful and military changes to Arab states and to North and West Africa. Gulf Arab states, like Qatar, Saudi Arabia and United Arab Emirates, are instrumental in the western new invasive policy of bringing freedom, justice and democracy to other Arab states like Syria, Egypt and Yemen.
The House set aside, more accurately, ignored a bill sponsored by Massachusetts Congressman John Tierney that would pay for continued student loan subsidies and prevent the rate increases by eliminating some tax breaks for big oil and gas companies. Instead, Speaker Boehner put up a Republican sponsored bill which passed that would preserve low interest rates at the expense of a disease prevention fund in the Affordable Care Act, a fund that provides cervical and breast cancer screenings, among other things.
Even if I know that Vermaelen won’t play again for us this season, I’m not entirely optimistic about him playing next season. He says that the tendon is okay but the muscles around it need to be strengthened. That doesn’t sound too good if you ask me.
Also, chances are good that the publisher might initially print 30,000 copies but most debut authors, on average, will sell-through anywhere between 50 to 90% of those 30,000 copies.
Xavia Ali Vicente
I'm not making a prediction, I'm only saying that predicting the future is hard, very few get it right, and more surprises will be in store.
I grabbed a pair of socks and my sneakers and padded down the stairs into the kitchen. Mom was dressed, as usual, in a tailored blazer and pencil skirt. She had the same wild hair that I had, but she somehow managed to make it behave in a tightly controlled bun at the nape of her neck. I knew that she wanted to look extra-professional for her new job.
Once your child is turned forward-facing, keeping your child harnessed as long as possible in a 5-point harness is key. The 5-point harness will evenly distribute the forces of a crash over the child’s entire body, compared to a seatbelt having only 3-points of contact. Look for a car seat that can keep your child harnessed until at least 50lbs. These seats have significantly taller top slots than seats that only harness to 40lbs, as 40lb seats are most often outgrown by height well before 40lbs. A forward-facing seat is outgrown when either the child reaches the maximum weight limit, or when their shoulders are above the top slots.
I look forward to a friend coming in today and staying the night in the park. It will be good to visit for a spell.
Braintree, MA 02184
If you live in the Northeastern United States, chances are you’ve spent some time in Maine at some point or another. The sloganeers call it “Vacationland,” and for many of us who are “from away,” that’s all it is. Beyond Ogunquit, Bar Harbor and Kennebunkport, however, the story of contemporary Maine today is more complex.
Here, I present for your delectation a brief gallery of some eerie images of the Lake District, that wild and mountainous corner of northwest England which is more wreathed in mystery and rural superstition than almost any other part of the UK.
The history of elevated footwear goes all the way back to ancient Greece and Rome when they were linked to "oriental adornment and concepts of the exotic". During medieval times, elevating footwear was a gender and religious identifier. In the 16th century, such footwear reflected cultural influences, familial status and standards of feminine beauty. At the end of the 16th century, the heel was introduced from the Near East and chopines were eclipsed by the mule and slap sole shoe (which I will discuss in an upcoming post).
1. Walk more
Homework- Give each student a Take Home Test #1 for their parents to go over with them to review what we have done in class. Parents need to help their child fill this out and bring back to class the following week. Students that complete their homework and bring it back to class will be able to play Homeworkopoly. Each Sunday the students make a mini story book and/or story wheel in class. Students need to read these to their parents (or the parents read to them) the mini book and/or story wheel for homework.
After having some minor irritation in the morning and calling the doctor, it was confirmed there was nothing to worry about, so off we went... shopping. I spent every last penny of my birthday money on cute maternity clothes for work and a bathing suit. Upon my return home, well to my Mom's, things were still going well.
Different Types of Experiences
Writer : Michael Kamsky
Essential Oils: See there will be one I lose you on…hmm maybe I lost you at the title, and you have read on out of sheer “sheah right-ness”….
Anyway, here's a link to my little report, tabulating and cogitating on what I've measured.
"We cannot be in a situation where very wealthy individuals are able to wipe out their bills by using these reliefs."
The thought of contracting the disease terrifies me, and hearing stories of those who have to lie with it always make me feel upset. There’s now one in twenty gay men who are HIV positive. Going by my ‘magic number’ that means I’ve potentially had sex with 1.5 people with the disease.
My day went like this today...
As far as the Matron could see, he was making no attempt to: A) find an apartment B) find a closer job C) Find a job that would give him more than ten hours a week and a sustainable income D) Locate any resources or people who might help him E) Find a roommate or dorm
When I undertook my challenge to create a body of work from my topic Domestic Duties I knew it would be anything than the norm. Initially starting out by compling a list of ONE words from everybody (on household chores), the plan was to create an installation with the 'one' words written onto pegs and hung from a Hills Hoist clothesline - I soon realised a break down was needed and decided to formulate 'Chapters' - this body of work comprising Chp. 2 (Chp.1 - Installation IMAGINE THAT! Showcase event 2011)
So basically, the Month of Reading All the Books will focus on putting a huge dent in my To Read pile. And personally, I can't wait! I hope to recommend some of my favorites on here, but I am notoriously bad about writing coherent reviews for books I love. It usually ends up as me saying, "This is the best. THE BEST. ashgfjksksgl;dsd." But I will certainly try!
So, a story that basic could be told by anybody, and probably have turned out okay. What Coscarelli does as director and writer is concoct a story and a manner of storytelling that makes this entire film seem like a disjointed, stream-of-consciousness dream where things happen with little connection to one another, only to come together in a linear sense after all is said and done. I'll give credit where credit is due; this horror movie has the unsettling feeling as if we - the audience - is experiencing the same hallucination on-screen that the characters are.
